From Desolation to Prosperity

The Cataclysmic Birth (0 - 300)
Continental Beginning

The formation of Igir began with the most violent natural event recorded in planetary history—a supervolcanic eruption beneath the ocean’s surface. For centuries, the deep waters were still, but tectonic shifts and mounting pressure within the earth’s mantle eventually culminated in a catastrophic upheaval. The eruption unleashed an incomprehensible volume of magma, ash, and molten rock, reshaping the seafloor into an expanse of fiery destruction.

For nearly 300 years, the supervolcano’s continuous activity drove the creation of a new landmass. Towering plumes of smoke filled the sky, casting the surrounding seas in an eerie, perpetual twilight. As the magma cooled and solidified, it formed jagged cliffs and craggy landscapes dotted with volcanic vents still spewing sulfuric gasses and molten rock into the air. This was a realm of both birth and death—a land formed by raw, unbridled power and shaped by elemental chaos.

The newly formed land of Igir was initially hostile to life. Its surface was a scorched, barren expanse where rain, when it fell, turned to acidic steam upon contact with the molten rock. Geysers erupted violently, sending boiling water skyward, while rivers of lava carved their way through the landscape, occasionally merging into massive calderas that dotted the terrain. The land was rich with minerals, but it was devoid of soil, vegetation, or shelter. It was a realm of fiery creation, marked by the primal forces of earth and heat.

Yet, amidst the chaos, life began to find a foothold. The first to adapt were the Khamadmi, a species that evolved uniquely to this volatile environment. Originally aquatic creatures, the Khamadmi were driven from the seas by the upheaval. With tough, scaled skin and bipedal mobility, they were capable of withstanding extreme temperatures and traversing the rugged volcanic terrain. Their sharp, barbed teeth and powerful jaws enabled them to prey on both sea creatures washed ashore by violent tides and any early life that dared to emerge from the cooling ash fields.

The Khamadmi became the dominant predators of this nascent land, embodying its brutality and resilience. They not only survived but thrived, claiming territories along the rocky coastlines and venturing further inland as the land gradually cooled. The Khamadmi’s territorial behavior made them formidable guardians of the newly formed continent, turning Igir into a natural fortress of fiery peril.

By the end of the 300-year formation period, volcanic activity began to subside, and the land showed the earliest signs of stabilization. Volcanic rock, rich in minerals, slowly started to weather under the combined forces of wind and the first gentle rains, creating the initial layers of nutrient-rich soil. Early life forms were limited to hardy lichens and mosses that clung to crevices where moisture collected, signaling the beginning of Igir’s slow transformation from a desolate wasteland to a land capable of sustaining more complex life.

While the Khamadmi were the first to adapt, the coming centuries would see the emergence of new forms of life—creatures evolving slowly within the mineral-rich soils left behind by the volcanic eruptions. These conditions, though still harsh, laid the groundwork for future ecosystems that would later support the rise of human civilization.

The Cataclysmic Birth set the tone for Igir’s early history: a land forged in fire and defined by survival, a world where only the most adaptable could endure. The Būtrani were the first to locate this newly formed land, and it was into this landscape that the Būtrani exiled thousands to a land still in the process of becoming, a stage set by nature’s rawest elements for the unfolding drama of human struggle, adaptation, and eventual unity. The continent’s volcanic birth was not merely the beginning of a landmass but the start of a grueling and transformative era that would shape its history for millennia to come.

Exile Exodus (0 - 150 ED)
Primal Instinct

The Būtrani, a distant civilization known for their strict social structures and relentless pursuit of order, had long faced a growing problem. Their cities were overcrowded, and their streets teemed with the homeless, the destitute, and the condemned. Driven by both pragmatism and cruelty, the Būtrani devised a harsh solution. In 0 ED (Era of Desolation), they launched an expedition of voyagers to the newly discovered land of Igir—a volatile, barely habitable continent born of violent eruptions and still wreathed in steam and ash. The voyagers deemed the land unfit for Būtrani colonization due to its wild nature, but the leaders back home saw it as an ideal place to dispose of unwanted souls.
The exiles were a diverse group: criminals, political dissidents, and those deemed expendable by the social elite. A fleet of ships carried the first 3,000 exiles, each individual bearing a mark of shame burned into their flesh—a stark reminder of their banishment. As the fleet approached the shores of Igir, the landscape came into view: a rugged, smoke-hazed land with jagged peaks and vast expanses of black volcanic rock. The Būtrani had provided minimal provisions, assuming that most would perish within a matter of years. This was not a relocation—it was a death sentence.
Upon disembarkation, chaos reigned. The exiles, already weakened from the arduous journey and demoralized by their forced removal from Būtrani society, scrambled for the meager supplies left on the beaches. Fights broke out almost immediately, as food and tools became the first tokens of power in this harsh new world. Groups formed quickly, based on previous affiliations, tribal instincts, or mere convenience. Some sought to explore the interior of the continent in search of resources, while others stayed by the shore, hoping for a miracle that would not come.
The initial survival rate was grim. Many succumbed to the inhospitable environment within weeks, either by starvation, exposure, or the predation of Khamadmi. By the time the second wave of exiles arrived six years later, the landing zone was strewn with half-buried remains—some decomposing naturally, others stripped to the bone by scavenging Khamadmi. The new arrivals were shocked by the conditions, but desperation forced them to adapt quickly.
Over the next 150 years, the Būtrani continued to send small groups of 250 exiles at regular intervals. They had no contact with the exiles and no interest in their fate. By the time the last transport arrived in 150 ED, the exile population had dwindled to around 1,200 survivors. Though they remained divided into small groups, they had begun to develop rudimentary survival strategies. They scavenged what little they could find, from sharp stones to durable driftwood, and began to craft basic tools and weapons. Stone knives, spears tipped with obsidian, and simple slings made from braided plant fibers became essential tools in their fight for survival.
The exiles discovered that survival required more than brute strength; it required resourcefulness. Those who ventured inland found caves to shelter them from the fierce elements, while others built raised huts from fallen trees, using vines as ropes. In extreme cases, desperate survivors even resorted to weaving ladders from the hair of the dead to construct elevated defenses against the Khamadmi. These creatures, still the dominant predators of the continent, forced the exiles to adopt increasingly creative strategies for defense, such as luring the Khamadmi into pit traps lined with sharp stones.
Despite the hostile conditions, a basic understanding of the land began to emerge. Early foragers identified small patches of hardy vegetation, some of which proved edible, while others were used for medicinal purposes. The discovery of a tough, starchy root named Doya provided a modest but reliable food source, offering a measure of stability to those who cultivated it. The exiles’ growing familiarity with the terrain and its resources marked the earliest steps toward adaptation, albeit driven by the desperation of survival.
However, the harshness of the environment continued to shape the exiles’ relationships with one another. The scarcity of resources led to violent conflicts between groups, each vying for control of vital supplies. Cannibalism, a dark reality born of absolute need, became more prevalent as the exiles faced prolonged famine. Only the strongest or most cunning managed to survive, giving rise to a new kind of leadership—one based not on rank or birthright, but on the ability to ensure the survival of the group.
By the end of the Exile Exodus, the people of Igir were no longer simply Būtrani outcasts; they had become something different altogether. Shaped by the land’s cruelty and forced to adapt to the ever-present dangers, they had developed a sense of fierce resilience. Though scattered and divided, their struggle had planted the seeds of a uniquely Igiri identity—one defined by an unyielding will to endure, despite the grim odds.
With the completion of the final transport in 150 ED, the Būtrani's involvement with Igir came to an end. Yet, the story of the exiles was just beginning, as they faced an uncertain future in a land where the greatest battles were still to come—both against the continent’s predators and among themselves.

The Feast of Shadows (150 - 153 ED)
Madness by Desperation

The final Būtrani transport in 150 ED marked a significant turning point for the exiles of Igir. With no further arrivals, the people were forced to accept their fate—this desolate land was their only reality. Despite their attempts at adaptation, resources remained painfully scarce, and food supplies continued to dwindle. This scarcity intensified hostilities among the exiles, and the fragile social structures that had begun to form started to crumble. It was a time of unparalleled desperation, and it would soon culminate in the most brutal chapter of early Igiri history: the Feast of Shadows.
By this time, roughly 600 exiles remained, divided into small, desperate groups across the southeastern coasts and inland regions of Igir. Relations between these groups were tenuous at best, with occasional truces broken as swiftly as they were made. Trust was scarce, as rumors of betrayal, theft, and even cannibalism circulated widely. Survival became a zero-sum game—one could only gain by the losses of another. The first signs of the coming slaughter were subtle but deadly. Disappearances, once rare, became common, and small skirmishes quickly escalated into all-out conflict.
The Feast of Shadows began in late 151 ED, sparked by a raid on a small group’s food reserves near the coastal cliffs. This attack was not an isolated incident; it was the prelude to a chain of retaliatory strikes that soon engulfed the entire southeastern region. Fueled by rage and desperation, the groups became locked in a relentless cycle of violence. Alliances, forged for convenience, broke apart as soon as the promise of more food or resources became apparent elsewhere. The exiles were no longer merely struggling to survive—they had turned on each other, consumed by a primal need to dominate, even at the cost of their humanity.
Over the course of nearly three months, the killings reached a new level of savagery. It was not just a matter of taking what was needed but also of eliminating potential threats to future survival. Each group, now operating under an unspoken doctrine of total war, sought to annihilate competitors entirely. This meant not only raiding food stores but also slaughtering every man, woman, and child to prevent revenge or reprisal. The brutality was so extreme that some groups began to leave traps laden with poisoned meat or spiked pits, aiming to cripple or kill potential raiders before direct conflict could even occur.
Cannibalism, which had previously been a grim last resort, became a calculated strategy. Many exiles viewed it as not just a means of survival but a psychological weapon, using it to instill fear and break the spirits of weaker groups. The Khamadmi, ever opportunistic predators, also took advantage of the chaos. Drawn by the scent of blood and the sounds of battle, they attacked the combatants indiscriminately, often tearing through both sides of a conflict before retreating into the shadows.
By the beginning of 152 ED, less than 400 exiles remained. The survivors were hardened, driven by the basest instincts. Those still alive were skilled in evasion and combat, having learned to navigate the rocky terrain and use the volcanic landscape to their advantage. The deepening hunger, coupled with the relentless violence, began to wear down even the most resilient among them. Many succumbed to starvation or the elements, their bodies left as grim markers on a land already littered with death.
Amidst the horror, a few individuals retained a faint glimmer of humanity. These rare figures, often skilled healers or herbalists, attempted to mediate conflicts or tend to the wounded. However, their efforts were largely in vain, as trust was a forgotten concept. One notable healer, an exile named Yela, managed to convince a small group to spare another group’s children during a raid, marking one of the few merciful acts of the era. Yela’s story, though a rare exception, would later become a symbol of endurance, representing a fragile hope that humanity was not entirely lost in the darkness.
The turning point of the Feast of Shadows came in mid-152 ED, when the larger groups, now reduced to mere fragments of their former numbers, could no longer sustain constant warfare. Resources were so depleted that further conflict became almost impossible. Instead of fighting, the exiles began to scavenge the dead—both human and Khamadmi—for anything useful. Bone tools, sinew ropes, and makeshift weapons became essential for the remaining survivors, who no longer had the energy or numbers to launch full-scale attacks. The landscape became eerily quiet, as those still alive focused solely on subsistence, abandoning the thought of conquest.
The Feast of Shadows came to an end not through peace but through sheer attrition. By mid-153 ED, only around 200 survivors remained, scattered and divided across the landscape. Weakened and broken, they were little more than remnants of a once-larger group of exiles. It was a period defined by absolute despair, where the pursuit of survival had reached its lowest, most desperate depths. With the end of the Feast of Shadows, the survivors faced an uncertain future in a land where the greatest battles were still to come—not just against Igir’s harsh landscape and fierce predators, but within the hearts of the people themselves.

The Feast of Shadows marked the lowest point of human existence on Igir. It was an era defined by absolute desperation, where the concepts of trust and unity were discarded in favor of raw survival. However, it also set the stage for change. The survivors, scarred by the horrors they had witnessed and perpetrated, carried with them the hard-earned understanding that no one could thrive alone in such a hostile land. It was this realization, born of darkness and death, that would eventually lead to the tentative beginnings of diplomacy and the first steps toward a more unified existence in Igir.



The Khamadmi Extermination Campaign (153 - 200ED)
Military Action

As the survivors of the Feast of Shadows struggled to recover from years of relentless conflict, they found themselves facing a different but equally pressing threat: the Khamadmi. These predators, once opportunistic scavengers of human conflicts, had reclaimed their dominance over the land, emboldened by the reduced human population. The survivors, now numbering fewer than 200, realized that survival was impossible without addressing the ever-present danger of these creatures.
The seven remaining tribes—Dyenra, Udrade, Kokhran, Kl̴enka, Dl̴ushˠ, Radye, and Myoras—emerged as the core of the scattered survivors. Each had developed a keen awareness of the Khamadmi’s behaviors and weaknesses through years of harrowing encounters. Though the tribes remained wary of one another, they understood that a coordinated effort was essential to reduce the Khamadmi threat. For the first time since their arrival on Igir, there was a shared goal that transcended tribal divisions, however fragile that unity might have been.
The Khamadmi were formidable predators, with their barbed teeth and powerful, agile bodies adapted perfectly to Igir's rugged landscape. They moved with surprising speed on two legs but struggled greatly when forced onto their stomachs or backs. This weakness, noted by several tribes during earlier battles, became the focus of a new strategy: to trap and exterminate as many Khamadmi as possible in order to reclaim vital territories for human use.
Around 160ED, the tribes discovered a crucial resource for their campaign—Konueno Mesha, a type of rope made from the vines of a hardy plant coated with a potent oil derived from the Konueno fish. These fish, inhabiting the shallow coastal waters, were highly toxic when consumed, but their oil, once extracted, had unique properties that made the Mesha both flexible and extremely durable. The exiles had learned of the fish’s toxic nature through tragic trial and error, but this discovery turned a dangerous liability into a key asset.
Using the Konueno Mesha, the tribes devised a plan to trap the Khamadmi en masse. They created large boulder nets by tying stones together with the Mesha and lining narrow ravines, which they dubbed "Mi'khamadmi Remoshe," or "Predator’s Throat." These ravines were strategically chosen based on the Khamadmi’s known hunting patterns, making them ideal sites for ambush. The tribes would lure the Khamadmi into these pathways with bait—often captured game or even the bodies of fallen exiles—before releasing the boulders from the cliffs above. The traps were designed to incapacitate or kill the Khamadmi swiftly, preventing them from escaping or counterattacking.
The initial attempts were risky and met with mixed results. Some Khamadmi managed to escape the traps, causing casualties among the hunters. However, the tribes persisted, refining their techniques and learning from each failure. Over time, the campaign began to yield significant success. The Khamadmi, once fearsome and seemingly unstoppable, began to diminish in number, and their presence in the southeastern regions weakened. By 175ED, the seven tribes had established themselves as the dominant force in the region, reclaiming vital hunting grounds and establishing safer territories for their people.
The Khamadmi Extermination Campaign marked a critical turning point in the Era of Desolation. The tribes were no longer simply reacting to threats; they had begun to shape their environment actively. This shift in mindset signified more than just a temporary alliance—it was the beginning of strategic thinking and collective planning that would later become central to the development of civilization on Igir. It was a triumph of ingenuity over instinct, as the tribes recognized that collaboration, even amidst lingering distrust, could yield greater rewards than constant conflict.
By 200ED, the Khamadmi population had been reduced to the point where they no longer posed an existential threat to human survival. While still present, the creatures were confined to more remote areas, no longer capable of large-scale attacks on human settlements. The surviving tribes, now more stable and confident, began to expand their influence, exploring further inland and seeking new resources to sustain their growing numbers. The campaign had not only secured the exiles’ immediate survival but also set a precedent for cooperative endeavors that would shape the emerging society of Igir.
The Khamadmi Extermination Campaign was a significant chapter in the history of the Era of Desolation. It demonstrated the potential of unity forged in necessity, a lesson that would be echoed in the coming centuries as the tribes continued to struggle, adapt, and evolve toward a more stable existence. Though the concept of enduring unity was still distant, the campaign laid the groundwork for the strategic and collaborative efforts that would eventually lead to the Age of Unity.

The Discovery of New Wildlife (200 - 220ED)
The Curiosities of Youth

With the Khamadmi threat significantly reduced by 200ED, the survivors of Igir found themselves in a rare moment of respite. While the land remained harsh and resources still scarce, the absence of constant predation allowed the tribes to focus more on exploration and resource gathering. The need for survival had shifted from immediate conflict to a longer-term quest for sustainable living. It was during this pivotal period that two neighboring tribes, the Khomi and Dinyu, inadvertently set the stage for one of the most significant discoveries in early Igiri history.
Despite a general rule against mingling with other tribes, two young members—Srul̴ of the Khomi and Yinesh of the Dinyu—met unexpectedly while foraging near the borderlands between their territories. Both tribes had established camps close to a central forest, but neither had ventured far beyond due to lingering fears of the Khamadmi and the unfamiliar terrain. However, curiosity and the desire for more resources drove the two teenagers beyond the established safe zones.
In the early morning of 201ED, Srul̴ and Yinesh, fueled by a mix of youthful bravery and recklessness, agreed to explore the uncharted land further inland. They ventured toward the thin, spiky mountains visible from their camps, a region previously avoided by both tribes due to the dense foliage and rough terrain. As they navigated through this unfamiliar landscape, they were surprised to find a peculiar abundance of plant life and a marked decrease in Khamadmi presence. The air grew cooler, and the soil underfoot was softer, suggesting a more fertile environment.
Their journey took them to a cluster of five small lakes nestled among the foothills of the mountains. The lakes were surrounded by lush vegetation, including several new species of flowering plants. In this secluded region, Srul̴ and Yinesh made a groundbreaking discovery—three previously unknown species of mammals, each uniquely adapted to the emerging ecosystem of Igir.
The first species they encountered was the Yassa, a medium-sized marsupial-rodent hybrid. The Yassa had a thick, bushy tail and sharp, chisel-like teeth, perfect for gnawing on tough roots and tree bark. It was timid but curious, and its soft fur provided a potential source of warmth for the tribes, should they manage to capture and domesticate it.
The second discovery was the Krom, a peculiar quadruped with a long, thin neck and winding, bramble-like horns. These horns were not just for defense but also served an extraordinary ecological purpose—they carried seeds from the plants the Krom grazed upon. Some Krom had vines trailing from their horns, while others bore patches of moss or even blooming flowers. This symbiosis between animal and plant made the Krom a critical factor in the region’s expanding biodiversity. Srul̴ and Yinesh were captivated by this unusual creature, which seemed to embody the potential for harmonious coexistence between the evolving flora and fauna of Igir.
The third and most formidable discovery was the Al̴anikh, a massive arthropod with long, segmented legs, powerful claws, and a thick exoskeleton. The Al̴anikh was primarily a scavenger but could also be an aggressive predator when provoked. Its size and strength suggested that it played a major role in keeping the Khamadmi away from the region, as its powerful claws could easily puncture the softer underbelly of a Khamadmi. Srul̴ and Yinesh approached the Al̴anikh with caution, observing it from a safe distance before retreating to share their findings with their respective tribes.
Upon their return, Srul̴ and Yinesh reported their discoveries to the elders of the Khomi and Dinyu tribes. Initially skeptical, the elders were eventually convinced by the detailed accounts and the samples of unusual plants the teenagers had brought back. The Khomi and Dinyu elders, wary of repeating the mistakes made during the Feast of Shadows, agreed that this newfound abundance of resources must be handled carefully. They feared that the other tribes might overexploit the wildlife, leading to further conflict and instability.
By 205ED, both tribes had begun a slow, deliberate movement toward the lakes. The Khomi settled in the northeastern forests, while the Dinyu occupied the southwestern fields. The migration was carefully managed to avoid direct confrontations, but it brought the two tribes into closer proximity than ever before. This proximity heightened the need for clear communication and mutual understanding, as the region’s delicate ecosystem could not support large-scale exploitation.
As they settled into the new territory, Srul̴ and Yinesh continued to foster their bond, meeting secretly to discuss strategies for peaceful coexistence between their tribes. Their efforts were not solely for personal benefit; both understood that the long-term survival of their people depended on cooperation. However, they also recognized the risks of openly advocating for such cooperation, fearing backlash from tribal members still wary of other groups.
The next significant development came in 210ED, when the first signs of potential conflict emerged over shared resources. Small disputes broke out over hunting rights and water access, threatening to unravel the tentative peace. Sensing the potential for larger conflicts, Srul̴ and Yinesh took bold steps. They persuaded their elders to meet in neutral territory, hoping to negotiate agreements on resource distribution. This decision set the stage for the first formal diplomatic meeting in Igiri history.
By 220ED, the Khomi and Dinyu tribes had not only managed to maintain a fragile peace but had also established a foundation for a more structured form of diplomacy. Their mutual dependence on the new ecosystem fostered a sense of shared responsibility. This budding cooperation was not just a matter of survival; it marked the early stirrings of a more unified approach to life on Igir.
The First Diplomacy (220 - 235ED)
Mutual Interest

The cautious migrations of the Khomi and Dinyu tribes into the newly discovered central region of Igir had brought them into unprecedented proximity. Though the initial settlement was peaceful, the shared resources of the lakes and surrounding forests became points of tension as both tribes sought to establish their presence. By 220ED, small disputes over hunting grounds, fishing rights, and access to freshwater began to flare up, threatening to disrupt the fragile coexistence the tribes had managed to achieve.
Sensing the potential for a larger conflict, the elders of both tribes recognized the need for direct negotiation. This was a radical departure from the established norms of the Era of Desolation, where tribal interactions had been defined by either isolation or violent competition. The initiative for this unprecedented meeting was driven in part by Srul̴ and Yinesh, whose secret bond had continued to flourish amidst the broader tensions. Both had risen to greater prominence within their respective tribes, advocating for a cooperative approach to resource management.
In early 222ED, the elders of the Khomi and Dinyu agreed to convene in a neutral zone—a small clearing on the southern shore of the largest lake. The gathering was tense, with each tribe bringing a handful of guards to ensure safety. The air was thick with mistrust, as memories of past betrayals and the brutal struggles of the Feast of Shadows lingered in the minds of those present. Yet, the urgency of the situation outweighed old grievances, as both tribes understood that continued discord could lead to mutual destruction.
The negotiations were led by Elder Vashka of the Khomi and Elder Nyol̴i of the Dinyu. Vashka, a pragmatic leader with a deep understanding of his people’s needs, sought a fair distribution of resources that would benefit both tribes without giving too much ground. Nyol̴i, meanwhile, emphasized the need for a clear agreement on territorial boundaries and seasonal access to the lakes. The talks were slow, punctuated by long silences and the occasional flare-up of tempers. However, the presence of Srul̴ and Yinesh, who served as informal mediators, helped to keep the discussions focused.
The breakthrough came on the third day of negotiations, when Vashka proposed a system of alternating access to key resources. This arrangement would allow both tribes to fish and hunt in different zones depending on the season, preventing overexploitation and reducing the likelihood of direct competition. Nyol̴i agreed, suggesting a further measure: the establishment of a shared storage area for surplus food, where both tribes could contribute and draw from in times of scarcity. This proposal was a significant step forward, as it demonstrated a willingness to invest in the long-term stability of the region.
By the end of 222ED, the Khomi and Dinyu tribes had signed the first known diplomatic agreement in Igiri history. It was a simple document, carved into a large flat stone that was placed near the lakeshore as a symbol of the newfound cooperation. The agreement included clear terms for resource sharing, territorial boundaries, and dispute resolution. While not a formal alliance, it marked the beginning of a more structured relationship between tribes, one that went beyond mere survival.
The impact of this diplomatic breakthrough was immediate and significant. Relations between the Khomi and Dinyu improved, and minor disputes were resolved through the agreed-upon mechanisms rather than through violence. Children from both tribes began to play together near the lakes, and informal exchanges of goods—such as furs, feathers, and precious stones—became more common. The shared storage area proved useful during a minor drought in 224ED, reinforcing the value of mutual aid.
However, the success of this diplomatic effort was not without its challenges. Members of both tribes remained skeptical, wary that the agreement might be a ploy for eventual domination. Tensions occasionally flared, particularly when hunting parties from one tribe ventured too close to the other’s designated territory. It was during one of these incidents in 226ED that Srul̴ and Yinesh, now respected figures in their tribes, intervened to prevent an outbreak of violence. Their actions further solidified their roles as key advocates for peace, and their bond became a symbol of the potential for unity amidst the enduring mistrust.
By 230ED, the Khomi and Dinyu tribes had not only managed to maintain their diplomatic agreement but had also begun to explore new forms of cooperation. Joint hunts for the Yassa became more common, as did collaborative efforts to domesticate the animal. The tribes also exchanged knowledge about medicinal plants and crafting techniques, slowly weaving a more integrated cultural fabric. This process was not always smooth—cultural differences often led to misunderstandings—but it was marked by a growing sense of mutual respect.
The First Diplomacy laid the foundation for more structured intertribal relations in Igir. It demonstrated that cooperation, though fragile, was not only possible but also beneficial in the harsh landscape of the Era of Desolation. As the Khomi and Dinyu elders passed on the knowledge and terms of their agreement to younger generations, the seeds of unity were further sown, preparing the way for more ambitious attempts at unification in the future.

Unbreakable Bonds (235 - 265ED)
A Rare Meeting
With the First Diplomacy firmly established by 235ED, the Khomi and Dinyu tribes entered a new phase of relations, marked by collaboration and mutual benefit. The agreement forged between Elder Vashka of the Khomi and Elder Nyol̴i of the Dinyu had not only ensured resource sharing but had also sparked an unexpected cultural exchange. The children, who played together near the lakes, became a bridge between tribes, learning each other’s languages, customs, and games. Women from both tribes began to share cooking methods and medicinal knowledge, while hunters and artisans exchanged techniques for trapping, crafting, and survival.
Among the key figures of this era were Srul̴ and Yinesh, the two young men whose bond had been central to initiating the tribes’ cooperation. Now in their early thirties, both had risen to the ranks of their respective village councils—Srul̴ as a prominent hunter among the Khomi, and Yinesh as the trade manager for the Dinyu. Their influence played a crucial role in maintaining the peace and pushing for further integration. Their bond, once secretive and cautious, became a public symbol of the strength that could arise from unity.
The years following the initial diplomacy were not without challenges. In 238ED, a severe storm struck the region, flooding the lowlands and damaging the shared storage area near the lakes. The flooding caused significant losses to both tribes’ food reserves, threatening the fragile peace. However, instead of reverting to competition, the tribes came together in a remarkable display of solidarity. Elders Vashka and Nyol̴i coordinated a joint effort to rebuild the storage area on higher ground, ensuring that future floods would not pose the same risk. This collaborative response not only mitigated the immediate crisis but also reinforced the tribes’ commitment to their agreement.
As the years passed, the integration between the Khomi and Dinyu deepened. In 245ED, the tribes initiated their first formal joint venture: a large hunt for the Krom, whose unique plant-bearing horns were increasingly recognized as valuable for the region’s reforestation efforts. The Krom hunt, led by Srul̴ and Yinesh, was a landmark event. It demonstrated the tribes’ ability to plan, organize, and execute a complex operation together. The successful hunt yielded not only meat and furs but also new opportunities for domestication, as several young Krom were captured alive for potential breeding.
In 252ED, a defining moment occurred that would later be known as the Bonding Feast. During a routine trading caravan exchange between the tribes, a large Al̴anikh suddenly emerged from the surrounding brush, charging directly toward Yinesh. The Dinyu elder, caught off guard, was almost certain to be crushed under the creature’s massive claws. In a moment of decisive bravery, Srul̴ grabbed his long-spear, thrusting it into the Al̴anikh’s throat and pinning its head to the ground. The forward motion of the creature forced it onto its hind legs, where Srul̴’s guards rushed in to aid in its final defeat.
This act of bravery not only saved Yinesh’s life but also cemented the trust between the two tribes. In the aftermath, the tribes held a grand feast to honor Srul̴’s courage, but also to acknowledge the Al̴anikh as a symbol of the land’s harsh but sacred balance. The feast was marked by a solemn recognition of the challenges both tribes faced together, as well as a celebration of their growing unity. It was the first event where the Khomi and Dinyu tribes openly referred to one another as “brothers of the lakes,” signifying a deeper bond that transcended mere diplomacy.
Over the next decade, the integration of the tribes continued at a steady pace. By 260ED, it was common to see mixed groups of Khomi and Dinyu working together in hunting parties, trade caravans, and even in the shared construction of new shelters. This level of cooperation, almost unthinkable just a few generations prior, became a defining feature of life around the central lakes. The children born during this era, many of whom had friendships spanning both tribes, embodied a new cultural identity that blended Khomi and Dinyu traditions.
The unthinkable, however, eventually arrived. In 263ED, Srul̴, the Khomi elder and symbol of intertribal unity, succumbed to an illness that had swept through his tribe. His death was deeply felt not only by the Khomi but also by the Dinyu, who had come to see him as an ally and friend. A large funeral was held near the lakes, attended by members of both tribes. Yinesh, devastated by the loss of his lifelong friend, spoke at the funeral, praising Srul̴ not just as a brave warrior, but as a man who had truly believed in the power of unity.
The death of Srul̴ could have marked a setback for relations between the tribes. However, his legacy was carried forward by his successor, Myesh, a hunter who had been a key figure in maintaining intertribal relations. Myesh, known for his dedication to preserving peace, vowed to uphold the spirit of cooperation that Srul̴ had championed. He worked closely with Yinesh, who continued to serve as the trade manager for the Dinyu, to ensure that the bond between the two tribes remained strong.
In 265ED, Yinesh, too, passed away—this time of old age. His funeral, like Srul̴’s, was a joint affair, attended by both tribes. The Dinyu held a grand feast in his honor, celebrating his life, achievements, and commitment to the unity of the tribes. His successor, L̴aksho, was equally committed to maintaining the peace. With both tribes now fully invested in the long-term success of their cooperation, the bonds forged over the past three decades had become unbreakable.
The Unbreakable Bonds era marked a transformative period in the Era of Desolation. It was a testament to the potential for lasting peace, even in a land shaped by brutality and hardship. The relationship between the Khomi and Dinyu would serve as a model for other tribes in the coming centuries, demonstrating that unity could be not just a means of survival but a source of strength and prosperity. As the Era of Desolation continued, the foundation for broader alliances and the eventual Age of Unity was being built, one bond at a time.

The Flintforge Revolution (265 - 285ED)
A Useful Stone

By 265ED, the unity established between the Khomi and Dinyu tribes had demonstrated the benefits of cooperation amidst Igir's harsh landscape. While their bond was a symbol of hope, the broader region still struggled with division and isolation. At this time, Igir was home to eleven surviving tribes: Dyenra, Dinyu, Udrade, Kokhran, Khomi, Khasaldi, Kl̴enka, Dl̴ush, Radye, Myoras, and the Shidyona. Each tribe operated independently, constantly vying for territory and resources while navigating the continent’s unforgiving environment.
The Shidyona, known for their resilience, inhabited the rocky and barren Arid Mountains in the east. Their tools were primarily crafted from volcanic rock, which was sharp but brittle, limiting their effectiveness. However, in 267ED, Shidyona foragers made a significant discovery that would transform the technological landscape of Igir: flint. While searching for sources of fresh water at the base of a crumbling cliff, they stumbled upon veins of this hard, sharp-edged stone embedded within the rocky terrain.
Flint was unlike any material the Shidyona had worked with before. When struck against harder rock, it produced sparks that made fire-starting easier, a major boon for a tribe accustomed to harsh, cold nights. More importantly, flint’s durability and versatility enabled the crafting of stronger, sharper tools and weapons. The Shidyona, known for their ingenuity, quickly adapted their tool-making techniques to include flint, producing sharper knives, spearheads, and scrapers. These new tools allowed for more efficient hunting and resource gathering, providing the Shidyona with a critical advantage in the region.
News of the Shidyona’s discovery spread quickly among the other tribes. Flint was an immediate game-changer—its superior cutting edge could be used for both hunting and survival tasks. The Shidyona began trading flint tools with nearby tribes, including the Kokhran and Myoras, who were among the first to recognize its value. The Kokhran, situated in the foothills of central Igir, found flint especially useful for hunting Krom and other large prey, while the Myoras, skilled crafters, experimented with flint-tipped arrows and improved woodworking techniques.
The emergence of flint technology sparked what would later be called the Flintforge Revolution, a period of rapid innovation and adaptation across Igir. Flint knives replaced volcanic rock blades, allowing for cleaner cuts and faster processing of game. Flint-tipped spears, harder and more effective, became the standard for hunting and defense. Tribes that had struggled with inconsistent tool quality now experienced greater success in hunting and resource gathering. The Dl̴ush and Radye, known for their wide-ranging exploration, began to actively seek flint deposits within their own territories, driving a wave of exploration across the continent.
As flint became more widely available, trade networks expanded, fostering increased interaction among the eight tribes. While mistrust and rivalry persisted, the benefits of trading flint tools and knowledge outweighed the risks of isolation. Exchanges often took place at neutral sites, with tribes trading not only flint but also furs, medicinal herbs, and other resources. This growing web of trade signified the early stages of economic interdependence—a critical step toward broader cooperation.
However, the rapid spread of flint technology also led to conflicts over control of flint deposits. In 273ED, tensions flared between the Kl̴enka and Dl̴ushˠ tribes over a newly discovered flint vein along their border. Several skirmishes broke out as both tribes sought exclusive access to the resource. These clashes highlighted the persistent competition for power and resources, even as the tribes recognized the potential benefits of shared access to flint.
Despite these challenges, the Flintforge Revolution fundamentally shifted the way tribes interacted with their environment and each other. The Udrade, who lived near dense forests, began using flint tools to clear small areas of land for limited attempts at agriculture. Early farming efforts focused on cultivating Doya, a hardy root vegetable that had become a staple food source. With more reliable tools, the Udrade’s success in producing a steady food supply prompted other tribes to explore similar agricultural practices, albeit on a small scale.
By 280ED, flint tools had become widespread among all eight tribes, drastically improving survival rates and resource management. While flint technology did not erase the deep-seated divisions among tribes, it did foster a greater sense of intertribal awareness and dialogue. The shared need for flint encouraged tribes to negotiate resource-sharing agreements, which, though fragile, represented a step forward in the development of diplomacy on Igir.
The Shidyona, whose discovery had sparked this transformation, gained considerable influence during this period. They became respected as both traders and innovators, frequently sought out for advice on flint tool crafting. This newfound prestige strengthened the tribe’s position, elevating them from relative obscurity to a central player in the evolving dynamics of Igir.
The Flintforge Revolution was a defining moment in the Era of Desolation. It demonstrated humanity’s capacity to innovate and adapt, even in the harshest conditions. Flint, a simple but vital resource, became a symbol of resilience and ingenuity, bridging the gap between survival and the early stages of civilization. While unity remained a distant ideal, the lessons learned during this era—cooperation, resource management, and the sharing of knowledge—laid a crucial foundation for the eventual Age of Unity.

The Birth of Civilization (285 - 300ED)
Flourishment of Alliance

By 285ED, the Flintforge Revolution had reached all 11 tribes of Igir—Dyenra, Udrade, Kokhran, Kl̴enka, Dl̴ush, Radye, Myoras, Shidyona, Dinyu, Khomi, and Khasaldi. Flint tools had drastically improved hunting, resource management, and early attempts at agriculture, fostering cautious trade and diplomacy. Yet the continent remained divided by old rivalries and competition for resources, with tribes often clashing over territory. It was within this fragmented landscape that a visionary leader from the Kokhran tribe, named Niroklo, began to reshape the fate of Igir.
Niroklo was raised in the Kokhran tribe, located at the heart of Igir’s central region. The Kokhran were strategically positioned in the lush valley near the central mountains, which offered both natural defenses and access to vital resources like water, game, and flint. Niroklo grew up amidst tales of the Feast of Shadows and the struggles of earlier generations, but he was not content with mere survival. He believed in the potential for a unified Igiri civilization, one built on cooperation rather than constant conflict.
In 287ED, a sudden Khamadmi onslaught struck the Kokhran’s territory from the western mountain slopes. These beasts descended in overwhelming numbers, taking advantage of the mountainous cover. Niroklo, wielding his Khudryin—a polearm with a sword-like blade—led the defense, managing to repel some of the attackers while directing the retreat of Kokhran survivors. The attack left the Kokhran weakened and exposed, and Niroklo knew that the Kokhran could not withstand the Khamadmi alone.
Determined to form alliances, Niroklo set out to contact the Dl̴ush tribe to the southeast, situated near the same mountain range but farther down along the rugged slopes. The Dl̴ushˠ had always been wary of outsiders, their camp nestled amid rocky outcroppings that provided natural barriers. Niroklo, accompanied by two Kokhran warriors, made the arduous journey south through steep trails and dense forests, finally reaching the Dl̴ushˠ settlement. They were met with suspicion, as the Dl̴ush guards raised their spears in defense.
Niroklo requested a meeting with the Dl̴ush elder, Torvin, emphasizing the urgency of his mission. “We can no longer survive alone,” he urged. “The Khamadmi grow stronger, and we must unite to stand against them. We have refuge in the central mountains; join us, and let us defend our people together.” Torvin, a seasoned leader with a deep understanding of the region’s dangers, agreed to accompany Niroklo back to the Kokhran territory to see the situation firsthand.
The return journey was fraught with danger. As they neared the midpoint between the Kokhran and Dl̴ush camps, two Khamadmi ambushed the group. Torvin’s guards were caught off guard, and Torvin himself was gravely wounded. Niroklo, with his Khudryin, managed to fend off the Khamadmi, delivering swift, precise strikes that brought both creatures down. His bravery and skill left a strong impression on Torvin and the remaining Dl̴ush warriors, solidifying their trust.
Upon returning to the Kokhran settlement, Torvin, now convinced of the need for an alliance, pledged the support of the Dl̴ush tribe. Word of Niroklo’s bold actions spread quickly, and emissaries were sent to nearby tribes, including the Udrade and Myoras, who occupied territories east of the Kokhran. The Udrade were based in the fertile plains beyond the mountains, while the Myoras inhabited dense forests along the lower foothills. Both tribes, known for their pragmatic leadership, saw the benefits of a united front against the Khamadmi and other threats, and they agreed to join Niroklo’s alliance.
However, not all tribes were as open to the idea of unity. The Kl̴enka, situated in the northernmost peaks of the central mountain range, were fiercely territorial and suspicious of other tribes’ intentions. When emissaries reached their camp, they were met with hostility. Dekkor, the Kl̴enka elder, was dismissive of Niroklo’s vision, seeing it as an encroachment on Kl̴enka autonomy. “Do they know you’ve come to us?” Dekkor asked with a smirk. The emissaries replied honestly, “No, we seek others to follow Niroklo’s vision.” Dekkor, angered by the potential loss of influence, signaled his guards to eliminate the emissaries. “Ready the Khamadmi tamers,” he ordered coldly. “We will crush this so-called unity before it reaches our peaks.”
Meanwhile, Niroklo’s coalition continued to strengthen. By 290ED, it included four tribes: Kokhran, Dl̴ush, Udrade, and Myoras. The coalition remained fragile, bound more by the necessity of mutual defense than by a shared ideology. Niroklo understood that to sustain this alliance, he needed a unifying set of principles that transcended mere survival. In 295ED, he introduced the idea of the Moral Tablet, a set of guiding virtues intended to foster trust, fairness, and collective well-being. These values were not only practical but also spiritual, inspired by Ijalla, the Mother of Existence.
The introduction of the Moral Tablet was met with mixed reactions. Some tribes embraced the virtues as a means to build a more cohesive society, while others remained skeptical, viewing them as idealistic in a still-hostile world. Nevertheless, the tablet marked the first formal attempt to establish a shared moral foundation, reflecting Niroklo’s broader vision of a united Igir.
The Birth of Civilization marked the beginning of Igir’s transition from fragmented survival to a more structured and cooperative society. Niroklo’s coalition, though fragile and contested, laid the groundwork for what would eventually become the Age of Unity. As the alliance expanded and more tribes joined, the continent inched closer to a new era defined by shared values, strategic alliances, and a collective effort to overcome the harsh challenges of Igir’s landscape.

The Kl̴enka's Reckoning (300 - 310ED)
An Unprovoked Assault

By the year 300ED, Niroklo’s coalition of tribes—Kokhran, Dl̴ush, Udrade, and Myoras—had strengthened its position across central Igir. The alliance had begun to establish fortified settlements near the mountain range, with Niroklo’s vision of unity further fueled by the growing acceptance of the Moral Tablet. However, this progress was not without resistance. The Kl̴enka, deeply entrenched in the northern peaks of the central mountains, remained fiercely opposed to Niroklo’s growing influence. They viewed the coalition as a direct threat to their autonomy and their control over critical resources in the region.
Dekkor, the Kl̴enka elder, was determined to crush the coalition before it gained further momentum. He commanded his tribe’s Khamadmi tamers to launch a decisive strike against Niroklo’s stronghold in the central valleys. The Kl̴enka’s cunning over the wild Khamadmi was unparalleled; through generations of trial and error, they had developed techniques to lure and direct the creatures for strategic attacks. Dekkor’s plan was to unleash a swarm of Khamadmi into the valley settlements, intending to create chaos and weaken the coalition’s morale.
In early 302ED, the Kl̴enka’s attack began. Using baited traps and loud reverberating instruments designed to mimic the Khamadmi’s territorial calls, they managed to drive a considerable number of the creatures into the coalition’s settlements. The initial impact was devastating. The Khamadmi, powerful and frenzied, tore through the defenses, leaving Niroklo’s warriors scrambling to defend their people. The assault threatened to fracture the fragile alliance, as panic spread among the tribes.
However, Niroklo quickly recognized that direct combat would only result in further casualties. He gathered his closest advisors, including Torvin of the Dl̴ush and Yoreir of the Myoras, to devise a counter-strategy that did not rely on brute force. Niroklo proposed an audacious plan: rather than attempting to kill the Khamadmi, they would redirect the creatures back toward the Kl̴enka’s own territory. The coalition’s scouts had observed that the Khamadmi, once agitated, would follow distinct territorial markers and scents—an instinct that could be manipulated.
The coalition’s warriors, working swiftly under Niroklo’s direction, set up a series of lures made from strong-smelling animal fats mixed with the scent of the Kl̴enka fabrics. The bait was strategically placed along the lower slopes of the mountains, creating a trail that led directly toward the Kl̴enka stronghold. At the same time, drums and horn blasts were used to guide the Khamadmi along this path. The tactic required precise coordination and immense courage, as warriors had to position the lures while avoiding the Khamadmi’s frenzied attacks.
The strategy worked better than expected. The Khamadmi, driven by their aggressive instincts and the familiar scent of their handlers, turned away from the coalition’s settlements and surged toward the northern peaks. By mid-303ED, the swarm reached the Kl̴enka’s territory, creating chaos within their stronghold. The very creatures that had been used as weapons now became a dire threat to their masters. The Kl̴enka, unprepared for such a reversal, found themselves overwhelmed by the Khamadmi they had sought to control.
The sudden Khamadmi invasion forced the Kl̴enka into a difficult decision. With their defenses compromised and their resources dwindling, Dekkor realized that continuing to hold the northern peaks was no longer viable. The tribe began a hasty retreat, abandoning their mountain stronghold in favor of a safer location. By 305ED, the Kl̴enka had resettled on the western shores of Igir, beyond the mountain range. The move was driven not by defeat in battle but by a clever tactic that turned their own strength against them.
The successful redirection of the Khamadmi was a significant victory for Niroklo’s coalition, not only securing the central valleys but also demonstrating the effectiveness of strategic thinking over sheer force. It also sent a powerful message to the remaining tribes: the coalition was capable of both defense and cunning, making it a formidable entity in the increasingly complex landscape of Igir.
The Kl̴enka’s relocation marked the beginning of a new chapter for the tribe. While they had lost their position in the northern mountains, they found new opportunities on the western shore, a region rich in untapped resources. Though this move would eventually lead to the founding of a significant coastal city in the coming centuries, for now, it signified a major shift in Igiri geopolitics—one that consolidated Niroklo’s coalition as the dominant force in central Igir.
The Kl̴enka's Reckoning was more than just a tactical victory; it represented a turning point in the Era of Desolation. It proved that survival and growth depended not just on physical strength but on ingenuity and adaptability. Niroklo’s coalition, having successfully defended its position, was now poised to continue expanding its influence, and it was at this time that the Era of Desolation came to an end. Niroklo proposed the beginning of a new age, aptly named the Age of Unity (AU), and named his coalition Khomakl̴u, which in the Anili dialect of Butrani was defined as “Gentle People.”
The establishment of Khomakl̴u marked the formal beginning of a unified effort to bring peace and stability to Igir. While the challenges of true unity remained, the tribes now had a name and a guiding principle to rally around. The first steps of the Age of Unity would be shaped by the coalition’s efforts to integrate more tribes into its fold, solidify its governing structure, and maintain the virtues that had brought them together. The ideals of Niroklo and his coalition now stood as a beacon for the future, setting the stage for a new era of hope and collaboration.















 The Rise and Fall of Virtue

Era of the Founding: 0 - 99 AU

The Dawn of Unity (0 - 46 AU)
In the dawn of recorded history, the continent of Igir was a realm of strife and disarray. Storms ravaged barren plains, dense forests concealed threats both wild and tribal, and towering mountains stood as silent, unyielding witnesses to the chaos below. Survival was often dictated by cunning rather than honor, with each tribe grasping for sustenance in a fractured land. But amidst this discord, a figure later emerged whose name would become synonymous with the birth of civilization: Niroklo.
In the year 0 AU, Niroklo, a man of both formidable stature and profound presence, stood as a beacon of hope. His piercing eyes, said to mirror the fierce winds of the mountains and the serenity of the meadows, carried the weight of a visionary, not a conqueror. Guided by an inner calling to establish a new order, he founded the kingdom of Khomakl̴u, meaning “Gentle People." Niroklo’s rule was centered around ideals rather than force, as he sought to unite disparate tribes under a shared banner, despite the rugged and unforgiving terrain.
Assuming the title of Dakht, or “Father,” Niroklo led with humility. His governance was simple, often marked by the company of commoners rather than armored guards. He communicated not with commands but with appeals to virtues long lost in the strife: compassion, wisdom, and justice. Central to his rule was the belief that power lay not in conquest but in guiding his people toward unity through virtue.
In his early years as Dakht, Niroklo wrestled with the existential questions that haunted him: What was the true nature of the world? What force governed existence? His introspection led him to a profound realization: the higher power he sought was not a singular entity but the sum of all things capable of experience. This concept of a god was vast, encompassing everything that breathed life into the world, from the towering mountains to the smallest of creatures. To commune with this force, Niroklo turned to Miechtihil, a colossal elder tree believed to be a sacred link between the physical and the ethereal. He posed the question to Miechtihil: what may he call this all-encompassing presence? In response, the ancient tree whispered a single word: Ijalla.
In its origin, Ijalla was not a being but a term that encompassed existence itself. However, as the people of Khomakl̴u adopted the teachings of the Moral Tablet—Niroklo's codified list of 32 Virtues—they began to interpret Ijalla not just as a concept but as a guiding presence. Over time, these interpretations evolved into a personification, ultimately laying the groundwork for the rise of Ineilla in future generations.
Niroklo's central achievement was the creation of the Moral Tablet, the 32 Virtues that would serve as Khomakl̴u’s ethical backbone. Engraved upon stone tablets and positioned within the roots of Miechtihil, this act symbolized that virtue, like the tree itself, must be deeply rooted to sustain society. The Virtues encompassed both personal conduct and governance, with Mercy, Courage, and Temperance serving as guiding principles for all.
Niroklo’s vision extended beyond moral teachings to the physical organization of his kingdom. Settlements were carefully designed to embody the virtues. Central to each village was a towering stone obelisk known as the Pillar of Virtues, etched with the teachings of the Moral Tablet. Communal halls were built around these pillars, serving as both places of assembly and sanctuaries for the practice of justice. Disputes were resolved through reasoned dialogue led by elders, reflecting Niroklo’s belief that true battles were against moral decay, not mere physical foes.
Despite Niroklo’s vision, the early years were marked by adversity. The untamed land presented harsh winters, droughts, and rival tribes. These challenges, however, did not weaken Khomakl̴u; they forged it. The concept of Haelshi, or "Shared Struggle," emerged as both a cultural principle and a way of life. Facing hardships together strengthened the bonds among individuals and even extended to former enemies. Trade networks began to form as once-hostile tribes recognized the benefits of Niroklo’s teachings.
As Khomakl̴u expanded, deviations from the Moral Tablet emerged. Remote communities, facing different challenges, prioritized survival over strict adherence to virtue. Niroklo addressed these variations not with punishment but through education, sending Envoys of Virtue to the farthest reaches of the settlement. These emissaries served as living reminders that the Moral Tablet was not a rigid set of rules but a guiding doctrine meant to adapt to changing circumstances.
In the year 46 AU, Niroklo passed away at the age of 68, a remarkable lifespan given the era’s average mortality of 52. His death sent tremors through Khomakl̴u, and the people gathered around Miechtihil for a solemn ceremony of mourning. Niroklo’s body was interred at the base of the Spirit Tree, symbolizing that the roots of Khomakl̴u’s foundation were forever intertwined with his spirit.
With Niroklo’s passing, Khomakl̴u stood at a crossroads. The unity he had achieved was fragile, reliant on the leadership of new Dakht. The Moral Tablet, Miechtihil, and the shared memories of Haelshi remained as the lasting legacies of the First Generation. As the kingdom entered a new chapter, the question lingered: could Niroklo's vision endure without the guiding presence of its founding Dakht?
Thus, the First Generation laid the foundation for an evolving society, one destined to face new challenges, conflicts, and interpretations. Yet, Niroklo's vision remained a beacon to those who sought to preserve the unity forged against the odds of a chaotic world.


The Age of Growth (48 - 71 AU)

With the passing of Niroklo in 48 AU, a new era dawned under the guidance of the Elders, who assumed leadership as the Dakhtis. These Elders, chosen for their deep understanding of Niroklo’s teachings, carried forward his vision with reverence, but also with the awareness that adaptation was necessary to sustain it. The transition from the singular leadership of Niroklo to a council-based governance marked a significant shift in Khomakl̴u's approach, one that sought to broaden the responsibility of maintaining unity and virtue.

The period was characterized by a steady expansion of both population and territory. Fertile lands were cultivated along river valleys, transforming scattered tribes into unified settlements. While these communities were built upon the principles of compassion and unity, the Elders recognized the need for a more structured approach to maintaining the virtues of the Moral Tablet. Educational institutions were established as a key priority, aiming to educate the next generation in the teachings of Ijalla and the 32 Virtues. These schools became centers of community life, where children and adults alike learned the tenets of virtue, philosophy, and governance.

However, as the kingdom expanded, new challenges emerged. The influx of diverse settlers brought varying beliefs and customs, leading to a gradual dilution of the original teachings of Ijalla. While some continued to revere Ijalla as the embodiment of existence, others began to interpret the deity in different ways. The Spirit Tree, Miechtihil, once seen as a direct messenger of Ijalla, became a symbol open to diverse interpretations. To some, it remained a spiritual guardian, while others began to see it as a mere relic of nature or a divine judge.

Despite these shifts, the Dakhtis endeavored to maintain the foundational values of Khomakl̴u. Roads were constructed to connect distant settlements, not just for commerce, but as symbols of the bonds between people. Communal Halls, such as the Hall of Virtues, were erected in major settlements, serving as centers for discussion, meditation, and resolution of disputes. These halls became vital in reinforcing a sense of collective identity and shared purpose.

The Dakhtis encouraged open dialogue, allowing for debates about the application of the Moral Tablet’s virtues in a rapidly evolving world. This approach fostered a culture of reflection, ensuring that even as interpretations began to vary, the core principles of unity and compassion remained intact. However, the seeds of divergence were already being sown, as the rapid expansion introduced new complexities that would shape the trajectory of Khomakl̴u in the generations to come. The era of growth ended in 71 AU with the passing of the last Dakhti, marking a transition into a new phase of Khomakl̴u’s history, one where unity would be tested by the pressures of growth, diversity, and the ever-changing interpretations of virtue.







The Early Strain of Unity (71 - 99 AU)

The 3rd Generation of Dakhtis began its rule in 71 AU, inheriting a kingdom that was still marked by the legacy of Niroklo's vision. Khomakl̴u was now firmly established, with thriving settlements and well-maintained infrastructure. The focus remained largely on unity, with the Dakhtis working diligently to uphold the Moral Tablet's teachings. Their leadership was centered around community welfare, emphasizing virtues such as compassion, patience, and wisdom as guiding principles for governance.

During this era, Khomakl̴u's territorial reach expanded further into the fertile plains, drawing new settlers from diverse backgrounds. The kingdom continued to emphasize its ideals of inclusivity, with efforts made to integrate newcomers into Khomakl̴u’s cultural framework. Communal halls, now spread across distant settlements, remained vibrant centers for education, debate, and spiritual connection. The Pillars of Virtues continued to serve as physical and symbolic reminders of the kingdom’s commitment to Niroklo’s vision.

However, with growth came subtle strains. Regional councils, formed to govern more remote areas, began to develop slightly varying interpretations of the Moral Tablet's principles. These variations were minor, often driven by local circumstances like crop shortages, the need for rapid resource distribution, or unexpected conflicts with nomadic tribes. While such pragmatic adaptations were necessary, they occasionally sparked debates among the Dakhtis and local elders about how closely the Virtues should be adhered to in the face of pressing concerns.

The people's perception of Ijalla also began to diversify during this time. While Miechtihil remained a revered symbol in Khomakl̴u's heartland, distant settlements started to place more emphasis on local spirits, integrating them with Ijalla’s teachings. This adaptation was not viewed as heretical but as a natural evolution of faith, reflecting the distinct experiences of communities living in varied environments. Even so, the growing diversity of interpretations hinted at the challenges of maintaining a unified spiritual outlook as the kingdom expanded.

Despite these minor differences, the 3rd Generation Dakhtis remained committed to the original principles of Khomakl̴u. They encouraged open dialogue and adaptation while striving to maintain a sense of cohesion. Roads were improved to enhance connectivity between settlements, and educational initiatives were broadened to emphasize both local and central interpretations of virtue. There were occasional disputes, but the Dakhtis approached them with patience and a willingness to mediate rather than impose authority.

By 99 AU, the passing of the last Dakhti of the 3rd Generation marked the end of an era characterized by both growth and the first hints of divergence. While the core ideals of Niroklo still guided Khomakl̴u, the seeds of future challenges were quietly taking root. As the 4th Generation prepared to take leadership, the question remained whether the kingdom could continue to balance its expanding territory with the enduring legacy of the Moral Tablet.




Era of Genetic Evolution: 99 - 175 AU 

The Emergence of Vibrational Abilities (99 - 122 AU)

During the 4th Generation, a remarkable phenomenon emerged among the youth of Khomakl̴u: the ability to generate vibrations from their palms. At first, this anomaly was met with fascination and uncertainty, prompting widespread speculation. Guided by the principles of the Moral Tablet, the response was one of inclusion rather than alienation. Elders and Envoys of Virtue ensured that these children were welcomed and supported, adapting the virtues of Temperance and Patience to teach responsible use of vibrations.

The people of Khomakl̴u saw these abilities as a divine gift from Ijalla, reflecting the evolving relationship between the people and their understanding of the deity. In distant tribes and kingdoms, interpretations varied—some believed it to be natural inheritance, while others attributed it to cosmic or earthly origins, such as the god Thert' Zie, “The Belly of the Stone.”

As vibrational abilities became more common, their cultural significance deepened, sparking a transformation in Khomakl̴u’s traditions. This evolution was marked by the invention of the Srarora, created by Tsipt'etol, a string musician. The Srarora was a large, curved metal sheet designed to be played through hand-generated vibrations, symbolizing the harmony between traditional culture and technological progress. It quickly became central to festivals and ceremonies, showcasing the artistic potential of vibrational attunements.
Two additional instruments emerged during this era, further exemplifying the integration of vibrational technology into the arts. The Ibia was a long, rectangular wooden pipe with an upward curve toward the end, equipped with a vibration-activated shaker positioned just beyond the mouthpiece. This produced a distinct, distorted bass tone that became iconic in celebratory gatherings.
The Shyankhikh was a more formidable creation, crafted from the hollowed heart of the rare Shyankh, a massive predatory bird whose sightings were limited to only two recorded accounts during this time. The instrument featured metal cords of varying sizes strung vertically across its structure, accompanied by wooden windows of different sizes set within the heart’s natural openings. As one player vibrated the cords, a second player spun the windows, controlling how vibrations escaped and altering the tone and dissonance. The Shyankhikh was so large and loud that players had to be either entirely deaf or use extreme hearing protection to avoid hearing loss or potential brain damage.

Technological Innovation (122 - 147 AU)

By the late 5th Generation, vibrations became integral to everyday life in Khomakl̴u. The discovery of luminescent stones in rivers led to their use as a primary lighting source. These stones were mined and strategically placed throughout settlements, not only illuminating homes but also enhancing safety and fostering a stronger sense of community.

The medical field also embraced vibrational technology. Healers used vibrations to diagnose and treat internal injuries, significantly improving medical practices. Builders employed vibrations to assess the structural integrity of buildings and bridges, increasing safety and resilience against natural disasters. Vibrations even found their way into agriculture, where farmers learned to use vibrations to stimulate plant growth, boosting crop yields in previously struggling areas.

The rise of vibrational technologies brought changes to social dynamics, with mastery over vibrations becoming a respected skill alongside traditional trades. Despite the growing presence of vibrations in various aspects of life, the people of Khomakl̴u maintained a peaceful ethos. Discussions of weaponizing vibrations were nearly nonexistent, as the idea of using them for harm conflicted with the kingdom’s foundational principles. The focus remained on advancing society through innovation and harmony.

Militant Defenses (147 - 175 AU)

As the 6th Generation took hold, early astronomers in Khomakl̴u began detecting unusual celestial vibrations, interpreting them as potential omens of danger. Though initially dismissed by many, these warnings soon gained credibility when news arrived of the Butrani’s sudden landing on Igir’s southeastern shores. The Butrani, descendants of a once-oppressive society, had exiled their unwanted—criminals, heretics, and others deemed undesirable—to the continent of Igir centuries earlier. Incensed by the flourishing civilizations they found, the Butrani viewed the Igirians as the heirs to the misfortunes they intended to cast away. Their initial encounter with curious villagers bearing food and gifts ended in brutal violence, marking the start of an unprovoked invasion.

Upon their arrival, the Butrani began cutting down the nearest trees, including a sacred Elder Tree. This was a severe violation of Igirian laws, which decreed that only designated logging forests could be harvested. The cutting of an Elder Tree was punishable by death, as these ancient trees were seen as both spiritual protectors and symbols of the land's heritage. This blatant disrespect provoked a swift military response from Khomakl̴u, which had long been built on principles of virtue and peace but was now forced to defend its lands and values.

In response, Khomakl̴u shifted its military strategy to a defensive posture, training soldiers as protectors of both the people and the Moral Tablet. The military's formation included Foot Soldiers, Archers, Citadel Wardens, and the elite Khomakl̴u Kenshi, all of whom were trained to uphold virtues like Courage and Temperance. These warriors acted not only as defenders but as moral exemplars, ensuring that the use of force remained disciplined and justified.

As the Butrani continued their aggressive campaign, the need for a tactical advantage became apparent. Elders debated whether vibrations could be used for military purposes, despite the risks of deviating from Khomakl̴u’s peaceful principles. This marked the early stages of a philosophical conflict within the kingdom, as leaders and citizens grappled with the need to balance peace with defense. While philosophical debates remained internal, the urgency of the Butrani invasion set the stage for the first thoughts of weaponizing vibrations—a shift that would not fully manifest until the 7th Generation.








Era of War: 175 - 251 AU

The Butrani War and Strategic Evolution (175 - 201 AU)

The Butrani invasion, which began in the 6th Generation, continued into the 7th Generation, exposing significant vulnerabilities within Khomakl̴u's military. The kingdom, having enjoyed a period of relative peace for generations, was unaccustomed to sustained warfare. The Butrani, seasoned by centuries of conflict, had a tactical advantage in both experience and brutality. Khomakl̴u’s initial forces suffered heavy losses, with foot soldiers and archers bearing the brunt of the Butrani’s unrelenting attacks. Despite their efforts, the defenders struggled to adapt to the Butrani's guerrilla tactics and brutal efficiency. Only the elite Khomakl̴u Kenshi and Citadel Wardens managed to hold their ground, owing to their advanced defensive training and vibrational techniques.

Recognizing the need for innovation, the Council of Dakht Elders convened urgent meetings to discuss a strategic overhaul. This led to intense debates among the Elders regarding the morality of weaponizing vibrations—a concept that, while controversial, seemed necessary to ensure the survival of Khomakl̴u. The Elders were divided: some argued that such tactics contradicted the peaceful virtues of the Moral Tablet, while others believed that defending the kingdom justified using every available resource. Ultimately, the urgency of the situation prevailed, and the Elders endorsed the development of vibrational weaponry.

The Council entrusted Nishan, a renowned construction engineer, with spearheading the project. Nishan proposed a variety of vibrational weapons, from handheld devices that channeled vibrations into lethal strikes, to defensive barriers that could repel enemy arrows. The most significant innovation was the formation of a new military cadre: the Resonance Channelers. These specialized warriors underwent rigorous training to harness vibrations not only for attacks but also for healing and protective barriers. The Resonance Channelers were to be trained exclusively within Khomakl̴u, marking a shift toward a more insular military development, though whispers of these innovations began to spread to distant cities like Ryamur and Le’Anu.


To integrate the new weaponry and tactics, the Khomakl̴u military underwent significant restructuring:
Khomakl̴u Kenshi:
Resonant Strikes: Infuse their ornate swords with vibrations, enhancing cutting power to penetrate Butrani armor.
Vibrational Parry: Deflect incoming attacks with minimal physical exertion, redirecting enemy weapons using controlled vibrations.
Defensive Quake: Send vibrational waves through the ground to disorient and unbalance foes.
Citadel Wardens:
Steadfast Resonance: Reinforce greatshields with vibrations, making them nearly impervious to enemy strikes for short periods.
Rupturing Thrust: Send vibrations through pikes to cause severe internal damage upon impact.
Defensive Quake: Unsettle enemy formations by creating controlled ground vibrations.
Foot Soldiers:
Earthshaker Stomp: Use collective stomps to send shockwaves through the ground, destabilizing enemy lines.
Shield Resonance: Vibrate shields to increase resilience and create protective formations.
Vibrational Boost: Enhance sprinting speed with quick, intense pulses from the feet.
Archers:
Sonic Arrowheads: Arrows vibrate upon impact, causing internal damage to armored foes.
Vibrational Aim: Use vibrations to stabilize aim, increasing accuracy in difficult conditions.
Aural Distraction: Fire Aural Arrows that create ear-piercing vibrations, disorienting enemies.
Resonance Channelers:
Vibrational Barrier: Create protective barriers of molecular vibrations to shield allies from attacks.
Quake: Crack the earth beneath enemies, staggering or even trapping them.
Resonant Healing: Accelerate natural healing processes using vibrations among comrades.





The Battle for Igiri Plains
As the war reached a critical point in the late 7th Generation, Khomakl̴u prepared for a decisive battle on the Central-Eastern Igiri Plains. The Butrani, unaware of the extent of Khomakl̴u's vibrational advancements, positioned themselves confidently on the field. The Khomakl̴u forces, led by the Elders, stood ready to unveil their new tactics. Musicians, attuned to the vibrations of their instruments, marched behind the front lines.

The Ibia players released a deep, distorted bass that resonated across the plains, while the Srarora produced ethereal, rising pitches. Finally, the Shyankhikh—an immense drum known as the “Heart of Thunder”—released thunderous beats that synchronized with the vibrations of the warriors. This rhythmic barrage reverberated through the air and the earth, causing the Butrani to hesitate. Some faltered, uncertain whether to advance in the face of such overwhelming sound and energy. Others, driven by confusion and fear, retreated.

As the Khomakl̴u forces advanced, the vibrational power surged. The Resonance Channelers unleashed Quakes, cracking the ground beneath the Butrani lines, while Kenshi and Wardens cut through enemy ranks with resonant strikes. Foot soldiers drove their enemies back with Earthshaker Stomps, and archers rained down Sonic Arrows that created chaos in the enemy’s ranks.

Personal accounts from the battle, recorded by surviving Kenshi and Channelers, reveal the overwhelming sense of unity that enveloped the Khomakl̴u forces. Many described feeling “in tune” with their comrades and the very ground beneath them, guided by the vibrations that pulsed through the battlefield.

The Butrani were decisively repelled by the end of the 7th Generation, marking a hard-fought victory for Khomakl̴u. However, the kingdom emerged from the war with more than just battle scars. As the people and Elders worked to rebuild, a profound skepticism began to take root. Many questioned whether the Moral Tablet’s principles still held relevance in a world that had required violent defense. Communal gatherings became arenas for debate, with some citizens calling for a reinterpretation of the virtues to include justifications for war.

The Dakht Elders attempted to reconcile these doubts by introducing new interpretations of the virtues, emphasizing the concept of Just Defense—a principle that allowed for the protection of the people without compromising the overall ethos of peace. Yet, these efforts met resistance, as some believed that the Moral Tablet’s original tenets were being diluted to justify bloodshed. This philosophical tension set the stage for the ideological divisions of the 8th and 9th Generations, as Khomakl̴u struggled to maintain its unity amidst growing internal conflict.

The Tides of Discord (201 - 227 AU)

In the aftermath of the Butrani War, Khomakl̴u was plunged into a profound crisis of faith and identity that reverberated throughout the 8th Generation. While the victory over the Butrani offered a brief respite, it also exposed the kingdom to philosophical and spiritual dilemmas that challenged its core values. With the absence of external threats, the internal divisions that had been growing quietly during the war began to manifest more visibly. At the heart of this discord lay a clash not only between differing interpretations of the Moral Tablet but also between two emerging spiritual figures: Ijalla and Ineilla.

During the 8th Generation, modernized faith began to gain traction among the people—a faith centered around Ineilla, a deity that represented a more human-like, personal form of divinity than Ijalla’s abstract and all-encompassing nature. While Ijalla was viewed as the embodiment of existence itself, encompassing both creation and the moral essence of the universe, Ineilla was seen as a more defined figure—one with a clear sense of authority, judgment, and personal involvement in human affairs. Ineilla's followers believed that she was not the universe, but a deity who judged the faithful and damned those who strayed from her commandments. This shift marked a significant transformation in spiritual and moral beliefs within Khomakl̴u, emphasizing individual obedience and devotion over communal unity and virtue.

The followers of Ineilla, known as Ineillis, began to introduce strict doctrines centered around concepts of sin and damnation. They claimed that those who did not adhere to Ineilla’s commandments were sinners who risked eternal damnation. This marked a stark contrast to the inclusive and philosophical approach of Ijalla’s virtues, which were designed to guide behavior rather than dictate it under the threat of divine wrath. Ineilla’s teachings introduced the idea of moral absolutes, where obedience was paramount, and transgression brought dire consequences.

As the 8th Generation advanced, three distinct factions emerged, each defined by their approach to both governance and spirituality:
Traditionalists (Ijallan Believers): This faction remained devoted to the original teachings of Ijalla and Niroklo’s vision of peace and unity. They argued that the Moral Tablet should remain unchanged and that Khomakl̴u's true strength lay in its ability to maintain virtue and moral integrity, even in times of conflict. Traditionalists believed that peace was not just an ideal but the natural path of a virtuous civilization. They saw the rise of Ineilla as a departure from the inclusive spirit of Ijalla, expressing concerns that the newer faith could lead to stricter societal divisions and a loss of the original purpose of unity.
Pragmatists (Ineillis Adherents): The Pragmatists were primarily aligned with the growing faith in Ineilla, advocating for a stricter interpretation of morality and governance. They believed that only through rigid adherence to Ineilla’s commandments could Khomakl̴u truly achieve security and spiritual purity. For them, the Moral Tablet needed to be adapted to Ineilla’s doctrines, emphasizing religious devotion over philosophical introspection. The Pragmatists viewed their faith as a means to establish order, even if it required punitive measures against perceived sinners and non-believers. They saw the potential for a more unified society under Ineilla, where fear of damnation ensured compliance and cohesion.
Militants (Capitalists): The third faction consisted of those who prioritized economic growth and material wealth as the true source of power. This faction sought to capitalize on Khomakl̴u’s vibrational technologies and military capabilities to expand the kingdom’s influence and resources. For them, virtues were secondary to the pursuit of capital and strength, believing that Khomakl̴u’s prosperity depended on its ability to dominate both economically and militarily. While they did not openly align with Ineilla, many Militants were willing to adopt the new doctrines if it furthered their own ambitions.

As Ineilla’s followers grew more zealous, conflicts between the factions became increasingly common. Public debates, which had once been forums for philosophical discussion, turned into heated arguments marked by accusations of heresy and betrayal. The Traditionalists saw the rise of Ineilla as an existential threat to the soul of Khomakl̴u, warning that her strict doctrines would lead to a society ruled by fear rather than virtue. They argued that the Moral Tablet was meant to foster inner growth, not enforce conformity under the threat of damnation.

In contrast, the Pragmatists believed that Ineilla’s commandments were necessary to restore order and discipline to a kingdom that had shown signs of moral decay during the war. They saw the Traditionalists as naive idealists who were unwilling to accept the harsh realities of governance. The Militants, while less concerned with spiritual matters, saw the conflict as an opportunity to consolidate power, often aligning with the Pragmatists when it suited their goals.

The shifting faith toward Ineilla also had tangible effects on daily life. Places of worship dedicated to Ijalla became less frequented, while newly erected temples to Ineilla grew crowded with followers. Rituals that once celebrated the interconnectedness of existence transformed into ceremonies that emphasized obedience and the avoidance of sin. Public punishments for moral transgressions, such as public shaming or excommunication, began to emerge under Ineilla’s influence, reflecting a harsher approach to justice that sought to instill fear of divine retribution.

By the end of the 8th Generation, Khomakl̴u was no longer the unified kingdom envisioned by Niroklo. The rise of Ineilla and the factions it inspired had deeply fractured the society, creating an environment of distrust and ideological warfare. Families were split by differing loyalties, as some embraced Ineilla’s doctrines while others clung to Ijalla’s original teachings. The Militants, driven by ambition and opportunism, used the divisions to further their own agendas, often at the expense of the kingdom’s moral cohesion.




Efforts by the divided council to reconcile these differences were met with limited success. Attempts to merge Ineilla’s commandments with the Moral Tablet only fueled further discord among them, as the faithful Dakht saw such changes as sacrilege, while Pragmatists demanded stricter adherence. Meanwhile, the Militants continued to advocate for more aggressive policies, often aligning with whichever faction promised the most power and wealth.

The 8th Generation ended with Khomakl̴u teetering on the brink of a full-fledged civil war. The principles of the Moral Tablet, once a guiding light, had become a battleground for competing ideologies. As Khomakl̴u prepared to enter its 9th Generation, the question was no longer whether the divisions would deepen, but how far-reaching their consequences would be.









The Tripartite Division (Year 227 - 251 AU)

The end of the 8th Generation left Khomakl̴u fragmented in spirit and vision, setting the stage for a deeper schism that would reshape the kingdom’s foundation. By the 9th Generation, the philosophical and theological debates that had simmered for decades erupted into an ideological split, resulting in the abandoning of Khomakl̴u. This period marked the first true division of Khomakl̴u’s territory, society, and soul, as each faction sought to assert its vision of Niroklo’s legacy in a radically changed world.

The Philosophical Rift: Three Paths Forward

The Traditionalists: Upholding Niroklo’s Virtues
As defenders of the original ideals of Niroklo and the inclusive virtues of Ijalla, the Traditionalists held steadfast to the belief that unity and peace were the ultimate moral objectives. They viewed the Moral Tablet as a living guide that should adapt without compromising its core principles, maintaining that virtue-driven governance could still prevail despite the increasing cynicism.
However, their influence waned amid growing doubts about pacifism's effectiveness in an age shaped by warfare and power struggles. While their message resonated with some commoners and Elders, they were often labeled as naive idealists, disconnected from the harsh realities of a divided land. The Traditionalists sought refuge in the southeastern territories, founding Nikhissem, which maintained the leadership title of Dakht. Their newfound home became a sanctuary for those devoted to Niroklo’s unaltered teachings.


The Pragmatists: Devotion to Ineilla’s Authority
The Pragmatists represented embracing the stricter doctrines of Ineilla. This new faith idolized Ineilla not as an evolution of Ijalla’s presence but as a personified deity demanding absolute loyalty and submission. The Pragmatists preached that Ineilla’s commandments were essential to restoring order and moral clarity, and that strict adherence—under the threat of damnation—was necessary to purify the land of heresy.
The Pragmatists moved to establish their stronghold in the eastern highlands, founding Ineillnokh, a theocratic kingdom where Ineilla’s teachings became law. Led by the Ailur, High Priests of Ineilla, they adopted a rigid governance model that emphasized spiritual discipline, moral policing, and the elimination of dissenters. This faction’s doctrine justified not only religious control but also forced conversions, seeing non-believers as enemies of the state, in some cases even killing non-believers in their homes under the guise of “Divine Retribution”.
The Militant: Pursuing Power and Capital
The Militant faction, primarily composed of wealthy merchants, influential officials, and war-hardened leaders, believed that capital and power were the true keys to societal stability. For the Militant, the path to prosperity lay in material dominance, economic control, and the strategic use of military force. The Moral Tablet, once revered as a guiding light, became a convenient tool for manipulation—selectively interpreted to justify aggressive expansion and control over resources.
Centered in the heart of Khomakl̴u, the Militant established the title Dyishram, a regime governed by an oligarchic council where wealth and influence dictated authority. They sought to consolidate trade routes, control valuable mines, and secure strategic alliances through both diplomacy and force. To the Militant, the ideals of unity and compassion had become antiquated, replaced by a focus on wealth accumulation and power projection.

The division of Khomakl̴u was not just political but deeply personal. Families were torn apart by conflicting loyalties, with members aligning themselves with different factions based on personal beliefs, ambitions, or survival instincts. Brothers fought brothers, parents rejected children, and communities once bound by shared values found themselves on opposing sides of a bitter ideological struggle.

Despite the factions’ differences, the Moral Tablet remained a point of reference—albeit with vastly differing interpretations. In Khomakl̴u, it symbolized authority, and made changes to directly reflect it; in Ineillnokh, it justified divine rule, making adjustments to justify the stray from virtue in the case of divine retribution; in Nikhissem, it remained a guide to virtuous living. This fragmented understanding of Niroklo’s teachings laid the groundwork for the conflicts and transformations that would define the generations to come.

As the 9th Generation concluded, Central Igir was fractured, each faction believing itself to be the true heir of Niroklo’s vision. The seeds of war and philosophical strife had been sown, setting the stage for a turbulent era of holy wars, economic rivalries, and ideological battles. With three competing paths laid out—peace, devotion, and power—the once-unified dream of Niroklo had nearly dissolved, leaving a legacy defined not by unity but by division.


Era of Divergence: 251AU - 7 RA

Period of Stabilization (251 - 282 AU)

In the wake of the Tripartite Division during the late 9th Generation, each faction established itself in distinct regions, marking a significant shift in the geopolitical and cultural landscape of Igir. The 10th Generation became a period of stabilization, as the Dakht, Ailur, and Dyishram fortified their respective domains and redefined governance based on their philosophies.
The Ailur, devoted to the rigid doctrine of Ineilla, sought to enforce Ineilla’s teachings with unwavering zeal. The people of Ineillnokh believed that their rise was divinely ordained, seeing their faith as not just a spiritual truth but a rightful claim to supremacy over Igir. Their society evolved around a strict hierarchical structure, with the Ailur holding the most authority. The Ailur imposed harsh laws on non-believers, driving many away from their territories and asserting that vibrational abilities were a divine gift exclusive to the devout. This view reinforced their sense of superiority and justified aggressive proselytization, often through force.
The Dakht, determined to preserve the original virtues of Niroklo, established Nikhissem as their sanctuary. Nikhissem was designed to reflect the founding ideals of Khomakl̴u, with open communal spaces, educational centers dedicated to Ijalla’s teachings, and governance rooted in the Moral Tablet’s inclusive principles, and leaders maintaining the name of Dakht. Here, vibrational abilities were viewed as natural phenomena to be understood rather than as symbols of divine favor. The Dakht focused on sustaining unity and peace, viewing themselves as the rightful keepers of Niroklo’s vision. While their influence waned due to fewer numbers and resources, they maintained a strong cultural identity and remained committed to peaceful coexistence and diplomacy.
In contrast, the Dyishram retained control over Khomakl̴u, the largest and most developed territory, claiming the central plains and surrounding settlements. Their rule was defined by a capitalist approach, focused on accumulating wealth and power to maintain control. Vibrational abilities were seen as strategic assets, with little emphasis on religious or moral interpretations. The Dyishram adapted to a more authoritarian style of governance, enforcing strict laws and militarizing key infrastructure to solidify their rule. Khomakl̴u’s opulence grew, driven by the expansion of trade networks and the aggressive pursuit of resources. However, the focus on capital and military power came at a cost—education, health, and communal values were deprioritized, leading to rising discontent among the lower classes. While internal power struggles occasionally erupted, the growing ideological tensions between Ineillnokh and Kanumik, to the north, began to unfold into war.

The Religious War: 
Ineillnokh vs. Kanumik (282 - 306 AU)

The ideological clash between Ineillnokh and Kanumik reached its boiling point in the 11th Generation, as the two kingdoms prepared for a devastating conflict. The Ailur of Ineillnokh, emboldened by their belief in Ineilla’s supremacy, sought to expand their influence beyond the eastern highlands, seeing it as a divine obligation to purify Igir of heresy. Meanwhile, the people of Kanumik, devout followers of Shoddŕune, were equally resolute in preserving their religious beliefs and territorial sovereignty.

The Kanumik’ faith was centered around the God of Time and Destiny, Shoddŕune, and his three celestial deities: Dl̴ode, Dl̴oshe, and Łesur. Each deity represented aspects of time, transition, and illumination, shaping the Kanumikan worldview. For the people of Kanumik, vibrational abilities were seen as cosmic gifts, manifestations of the celestial order, rather than divine exclusivity. This theological contrast made the war not only a territorial dispute but a battle of existential ideologies—one focused on a singular, rigid deity, and the other on a more cosmic, cyclical spirituality.

Ineillnokh’s Barracks: Forces of Divine Zeal
Sanctified Vibroarchers: Elite marksmen trained to unleash potent vibrational projectiles resembling Ineilla's Spears, which pierced through the battlefield with righteous force. They created magnifying distortion mirrors to enhance their accuracy, raining divine fury upon the heretics.
Divine Sentinels: Paladins clad in golden armor, wielding heavy claymores and greatshields inscribed with Ineilla’s tenets. As the vanguard of Ineillnokh, they advanced with unwavering zeal, believing each swing of their blade was guided by divine will.
Guardians of the Faith: Defensive Casters who used vibrational barriers to shield their comrades, creating impenetrable bulwarks. They believed these shields symbolized Ineilla’s protection, reinforcing their defensive lines.
Divine Healers: Priests who channeled healing vibrations to mend wounds and restore their allies' vigor. Their gentle resonances were seen as manifestations of Ineilla’s mercy, ensuring that the devout could continue the battle.
High Casters of Ineilla: Masters of both offensive and defensive vibrational arts, they summoned barriers for self-protection and wielded close-range vibrational thrusts and slashes as expressions of Ineilla’s wrath.
Kanumik’s Barracks: Forces of Celestial Order
Celestial Sentinels: Vanguard warriors clad in celestial-themed armor, drawing strength from solar or lunar alignments. They wielded vibrationally-enhanced weapons that seemed to shimmer with the deities' blessing.
Luminous Guardians: Defenders equipped with shields adorned with celestial motifs, capable of projecting barriers of light that reflected the strength of Shoddŕune's will. They served as the first line of defense, maintaining order and fortitude.
Stellar Casters: Masters of celestial vibrations, unleashing devastating spells that mimicked cosmic events. Their attacks symbolized the power of stars, creating radiant blasts that scorched the battlefield.
Astral Sages: Spiritual guides who inspired their comrades with philosophical wisdom and cosmic lore, reinforcing morale amidst the chaos of battle.
Heavenly Harbingers: Agile scouts who navigated the battlefield with ease, providing intelligence and strategic insights that aligned with the perceived omens of Shoddŕune and his deities.



The war between Ineillnokh and Kanumik was marked by large-scale attunements that tested the boundaries of vibrational abilities:
Ineillnokh’s Fury: A devastating collective attack by Ineillnokh’s High Casters, generating dissonant waves of vibration that tore through enemy lines, embodying Ineilla’s unforgiving wrath.
Smite of Shoddŕune: A coordinated attunement by Kanumik’s Stellar Casters, requiring at least 100 casters in rainy conditions to turn raindrops into high-velocity projectiles, symbolizing Shoddŕune’s control over time and the elements.

The conflict raged across the borderlands, leaving a trail of destruction and despair. Villages were razed, fields lay fallow, and both sides suffered heavy casualties. The war was not only physical but psychological, as each side’s zeal fueled an unrelenting cycle of violence. For the Ailur, victory meant the ultimate validation of Ineilla’s supremacy. For the people of Kanumik, it was a matter of spiritual survival against an invasive, intolerant force.

After years of intense warfare, both kingdoms faced the harsh reality of their unsustainable losses. The leaders of Ineillnokh and Kanumik, recognizing the escalating costs and diminishing returns of the conflict, agreed to meet for peace talks. The treaty negotiations were tense, filled with mutual distrust and lingering animosity, but the devastation of war outweighed the desire for total victory.

The treaty that emerged was fragile, marked by unresolved philosophical and territorial disputes. While it succeeded in halting hostilities, it did little to address the deep-rooted enmity between the two factions. Near simultaneously in Khomakl̴u, economic strains began to manifest as inflation and unemployment, sowing the seeds of societal unrest.


Khomakluen Precarity (306 - 335 AU)

As the 12th Generation dawned, Khomakl̴u was enveloped by a wave of economic instability and societal unrest. The preceding conflicts between Ineillnokh and Kanumik had severely disrupted regional trade networks, and the costs of military mobilization had drained the kingdom's coffers. Although Khomakl̴u had not directly engaged in the war, the ripple effects were palpable. Inflation surged, wages stagnated, and the value of the Igirian Nasho plummeted. As daily necessities grew scarce and prices soared, the once-thriving heart of Igir began to tremble under the weight of poverty and inequality.
The Dyishram, ruling Khomakl̴u with a focus on capital and expansion, found themselves at a crossroads. Their reliance on vibrational technologies and aggressive trade policies had bolstered the kingdom’s prosperity in earlier generations, but now these strategies seemed inadequate to address the growing disparities. The lower classes, who had previously accepted their hardships as a necessary consequence of progress, grew increasingly resentful of the Dyishram’s hoarding of resources. Tensions reached a boiling point when grain shortages led to riots in the streets of Khomakl̴u’s capital.
In response, the Dyishram devised a controversial solution: the construction of "Community Housing," a large-scale initiative aimed at providing affordable shelter for the growing population. The plan, however, was rooted more in greed than in genuine care for the populace. The new housing complexes were built hastily, with inferior materials that ensured long-term profits rather than lasting stability. Residents were forced to pay monthly rents that, while lower than market rates, were still burdensome in a time of economic decline. This initiative provided a temporary sense of stability but ultimately deepened the public’s mistrust of the Dyishram’s intentions.
As the economic crisis worsened, traditionalist voices from Nikhissem began to gain traction among Khomakl̴u’s disillusioned citizens. The Dakht of Nikhissem, though geographically distant, sent Advisors to the capital to preach the virtues of the Moral Tablet in its original, unaltered form. These Advisors argued that the path to recovery lay not in wealth or power, but in the restoration of compassion, unity, and equitable governance. The teachings resonated with many, particularly among the lower classes, who had grown weary of the Dyishram’s focus on material gain.
The Ailur of Ineillnokh also sought to exploit the situation, sending missionaries to convert the struggling citizens of Khomakl̴u to Ineilla’s doctrines. The Ailur presented Ineilla’s commandments as a source of strength and order in turbulent times, emphasizing the idea that obedience could bring salvation even amidst economic hardship. For some, the harsh certainty of Ineilla’s teachings provided a sense of purpose, leading to increased conversions within the capital’s outskirts.


By the end of the 12th Generation, Khomakl̴u was a kingdom beginning to tip on its axis. The economic precarity had not only eroded trust in the Dyishram’s leadership but also created fertile ground for ideological infiltration from both Nikhissem and Ineillnokh. The 12th Generation set the stage for a volatile future, where Khomakl̴u’s core values and governance would be watched as never before. While the Dyishram sought to maintain their hold through economic maneuvers, the Dakht and Ailur continued to vie for influence, each with their own vision for the kingdom's salvation in the hopes that someday, they might be able to reclaim what was once theirs. 

Subtle Shifts (335 - 358 AU)

With the economic precarity of the 12th Generation still lingering, Khomakl̴u’s populace remained vulnerable to new ideas and influences. The traditionalist Envoys of Virtue from Nikhissem, committed to spreading Ijalla’s teachings, traveled to the central territories of Khomakl̴u in hopes of rekindling the original virtues of unity and peace. They sought to remind the people of Niroklo’s vision, emphasizing virtues like Compassion, Temperance, and Fellowship as a remedy for the moral decline caused by the Dyishram’s greed.
Simultaneously, Missionaries of Ineilla, driven by the Ailur's zeal to expand their faith, began arriving in Khomakl̴u. Their message was one of salvation through submission, promising not only spiritual purity but also protection from damnation. For the many disillusioned by the Dyishram's governance, Ineilla’s doctrines offered clear rules and a sense of security, albeit through stricter moral enforcement.
The initial interest among the populace was divided. Some gravitated toward the philosophical and inclusive messages of the Envoys, while others found the definitive promises of Ineilla’s teachings more compelling. As the Missionaries promised a clearer path to salvation, they gradually won over those who had first leaned toward the Envoys' messages, convincing them that conversion to Ineillis was the more righteous path.
The Envoys, realizing their failure to establish a lasting influence, returned to Nikhissem with a sense of defeat. This setback underscored the growing strength of Ineilla's faith and the Pragmatists' influence in central Igir, setting a more subdued yet significant shift in the kingdom’s spiritual landscape.

Adaptation and Assimilation (358 - 385 AU)

The Dyishram, observing the increasing popularity of the Ineillis Missionaries, saw an opportunity to redirect public focus away from the issues of economic instability and their own corruption. Hoping to leverage this growing faith, the Dyishram began constructing Ineillis churches throughout Khomakl̴u, presenting them as symbols of unity under a common spiritual purpose.
While the Missionaries' presence offered the Dyishram a temporary solution to the growing unrest, it also introduced a new layer of control over the populace. The churches served as centers not just for worship, but also for moral enforcement, reinforcing the Dyishram’s authority through a shared belief system that emphasized obedience to both divine and political rule.
During this generation, vibrational abilities were increasingly interpreted as divine blessings from Ineilla rather than natural phenomena. This narrative shift further legitimized the Dyishram’s support of Ineilla’s doctrines, aligning their authority with the perceived will of the divine. The growing number of Ineillis followers accepted this explanation, seeing the Dyishram’s endorsement as a sign of spiritual alignment rather than manipulation.

Spiritual Integration (364 AU - 7 RA)

The expansion of Ineilla’s influence throughout Khomakl̴u reached its peak in the 15th Generation. The Dyishram, having established a network of Ineillis churches, worked to integrate the new faith more deeply into the kingdom’s social fabric. Public ceremonies, once centered around the inclusive teachings of Ijalla, now emphasized the virtues of obedience, repentance, and salvation through adherence to Ineilla’s commandments.
While this shift appeared to bring a sense of spiritual cohesion, it also led to the gradual erosion of Khomakl̴u's foundational values. The Moral Tablet, originally focused on virtue as a means to achieve inner growth and societal harmony, became a secondary guide—adapted to fit Ineilla’s stricter doctrine. The Dakht of Nikhissem continued their efforts to promote Ijalla’s inclusive teachings, but their influence diminished as the Dyishram maintained control through religious conformity.
The Missionaries' success in converting Khomakl̴u’s citizens had also altered social dynamics. People began to see non-believers as morally inferior, creating subtle but significant divisions within communities. Traditional rituals lost their relevance, replaced by ceremonies that focused more on public demonstrations of faith and the fear of divine retribution. This change was of ill promise to the Dyishram, as rebellion was less likely if the populace no longer stood on a united front. 
As the 15th Generation concluded, Khomakl̴u appeared more stable, and the Dyishram in their guilty pleasure of turning attention elsewhere, they began to refer to the time as the Reign of Ambition, further exciting the population with false promises of salvation and success. But beneath this façade lay a kingdom increasingly shaped by authoritarian spiritual practices and the pragmatic use of faith for political control. The Dakht of Nikhissem remained isolated, their voices of peace overshadowed by the drumbeat of Ineilla’s strict doctrine, setting the stage for the internal and external conflicts that would define the 16th Generation and beyond.
Era of Disparity: 0 - 121 RA

Akkho’s Reign (7 - 28 RA)

The rise of Akkho Budeshi as the new Dyishram marked a turning point in Khomakl̴u’s history. His ambition and greed were unparalleled, with a reign characterized by a sudden and unprovoked assault on Ineillnokh. The attack unfolded with shocking speed, as Akkho's forces, driven by the promise of wealth and glory, swept through the theocratic kingdom in just two days. The defenders of Ineillnokh, caught off-guard by the sudden onslaught, struggled in vain to hold their ground. Citizens, filled with disbelief and terror, watched as their sacred halls crumbled under the merciless advance of Khomakl̴u’s forces.
Akkho’s motivations were clear—domination, wealth, and the demonstration of his power. He harbored no personal vendetta against Ineillnokh; it was merely a target of opportunity. In the aftermath of his swift victory, Akkho indulged in extravagant celebrations, seemingly indifferent to the destruction he had caused. The once-proud kingdom of Ineillnokh lay in ruins, its people scattered across Igir, many forced to abandon their beliefs in exchange for survival. Some found refuge among northern or southern tribes, while others fled to Kanumik, compelled to adapt to new cultures or take up mercenary work to sustain themselves.
Akkho’s rule over Khomakl̴u was a facade of prosperity built on neglect and deceit. While new districts sprang up rapidly, their structures were shoddy, designed for temporary grandeur rather than lasting stability. Citizens soon noticed that cosmetic repairs barely concealed the deeper decay, mirroring the state of Khomakl̴u under Akkho's corrupt governance. This decay was both literal and symbolic, reflecting the moral and social disintegration that accompanied his pursuit of power. As the Ineillnokhian refugees sought new lives, the broader ethos of survival over honor began to shape the cultural landscape of Igir.
The arrival of Ineillnokhian mercenaries and displaced citizens in other parts of Igir further spread the sense of moral decline. They brought with them tales of Akkho’s cruelty and Ineillnokh’s fall, casting Khomakl̴u as a kingdom that had abandoned virtue for greed. While some tribes sought to maintain discipline and order, others adapted fragments of Niroklo's teachings merely to preserve basic societal functions. The once-strong ideals of unity and mutual respect gradually faded into distant memories, and Igir began to splinter further.
As Akkho’s reign drew to a close, whispers of discontent grew among Khomakl̴u’s people. The Dyishram’s authority was increasingly perceived as corrupt, but fear and oppression kept potential rebellions in check. The era left a legacy of instability, setting the stage for the harsh measures that would define subsequent generations.

The Seeds of Defiance (28 - 53 RA)

The 17th Generation in Khomakl̴u was defined not by fervent faith but by indulgence and control. The Dyishram, though not true devotees of Ineilla, continued to use her doctrine as a convenient tool for maintaining their authority. However, their primary focus was on fostering depravity rather than genuine spiritual adherence. Gambling halls, brothels, and taverns flourished as the Dyishram poured resources into expanding the entertainment districts, offering the people instant gratification and distractions from the harsh realities of daily life.
Amid this atmosphere of moral decay, a faint undercurrent of dissent began to emerge. Small groups of citizens quietly resisted the Dyishram’s rule, dissatisfied with the superficial indulgence and lack of moral integrity. These gatherings were secretive and disorganized, lacking the unity or strength necessary for significant change. Nevertheless, they represented the earliest inklings of rebellion—a discontent rooted not in spiritual zeal but in a longing for a more virtuous and just society.
The 17th Generation thus became an era of growing disillusionment beneath a facade of prosperity, marking the early stages of a larger movement that would soon come to challenge the Dyishram’s rule.

Draconic Enforcement and Silent Resistance (53 - 78 RA)

As the 18th Generation unfolded, Khomakl̴u’s population once again reached critical levels, causing food shortages, widespread poverty, and escalating despair. In response, the Dyishram, led by Kinul Shett, Oiye Chaldn, Ikidi Onduno, and Ayas Lamal, implemented drastic birthing laws to curb overpopulation. These measures were not only harsh but shockingly ruthless: mothers who bore more children than permitted faced the unthinkable punishment of execution alongside their newborns.
The Dyishram framed this policy as a necessary evil to ensure the survival of Khomakl̴u’s limited resources. However, this excuse failed to mask the brutal reality that lay beneath: fear and control. The brutal nature of the laws sent a chilling message to neighboring kingdoms and tribes—an unspoken warning that Khomakl̴u would enforce its rule without hesitation or mercy. It even inspired condemnation from the Khasaldi bastion to the north, Has’mir, which despite its own harsh laws, found Khomakl̴u’s actions extreme.
While this oppressive regime proved effective in reducing population growth, it left deeper scars on the kingdom’s social fabric. Crime became more covert, with offenders devising intricate plans to evade justice. At the same time, a new breed of criminals emerged: underground leaders who became symbols of silent defiance, working within the shadows to undermine the Dyishram’s authority. These figures were as elusive as they were dangerous, yet they managed to inspire hope among the oppressed, showing that even the most draconian measures could not fully suppress the human spirit.
Despite the fear that gripped the land, quiet acts of resistance persisted. Secret meetings, known as Whispered Councils, became more common, where the common folk discussed the possibility of reform or even open rebellion. Though such gatherings were small and rare, they marked a shift from passive discontent to a more active—albeit still hesitant—challenge against the Dyishram’s rule.
By the end of the 18th Generation, Khomakl̴u was a kingdom defined by fear, submission, and silent rebellion. The Dyishram’s grip remained strong, but cracks were beginning to show. The oppressive governance that had kept the kingdom in line for generations was now facing a subtle but growing threat from within—one that would set the stage for greater resistance in the coming generations.












Foreign Event - Significant Innovation: 78 - 84 RA
Khasaldi Zekaril: Mastery of the Storms
In the heart of the northeastern deserts of Igir, the Khasaldi tribe, known for their nomadic resilience and formidable warriors, introduced a groundbreaking innovation that would reshape Igirian warfare: the Khasaldi Zekaril, or "Khasaldan Charge." This formidable weapon was reputed to harness the power of lightning, an embodiment of the Ravathil, the lightning spirits believed to dwell within storms. The invention emerged as a result of Hassard Rishti’s ambition to elevate his people by wielding the power of the sky itself.
Hassard, a 24-year-old warrior driven by dreams of greatness, first envisioned the Zekaril during a journey beyond the familiar sands of the Khasaldi desert. The encounter with a fearsome storm near the ocean’s edge inspired him to create a weapon that could capture and discharge the raw energy of nature. Guided by this vision, he returned to the desert, eager to transform his revelation into reality.

The Khasaldi Zekaril was not merely a technological achievement; it became a symbol of Khasaldi strength and spiritual evolution. Crafted from the rare piezoelectric crystals found deep within a secret Khasaldi mine, the Zekaril converted vibrations into surges of electrical energy. To the Khasaldi, it represented their mastery over the continent’s natural resonance, transforming Igir’s vibrations into directed power.

The weapon’s construction was complex, requiring both advanced knowledge of vibrational attunement and skilled craftsmanship. The device was integrated at the base of a weapon's blade, just above the hilt, and functioned by accumulating vibrational energy generated during battle. Upon reaching a critical threshold, the Zekaril discharged stored energy as an electric shock, enhancing the lethality of the weapon. The discharging mechanism could be activated through a specific gesture, such as a twist of the hilt or a predefined motion, allowing strategic deployment in combat.

The introduction of the Zekaril marked a significant evolution in Khasaldi battle tactics. Elites equipped with this weapon formed new combat formations that leveraged its unique capabilities, striking terror into opposing forces. In the early stages of its deployment, rival factions often mistook the Zekaril’s electrical discharges for dark magic or divine wrath. This initial confusion and fear amplified its psychological impact, giving the Khasaldi a significant advantage in both duels and larger battles.

However, the Zekaril's effectiveness relied heavily on prolonged engagements, where sufficient vibrational energy could be accumulated. In shorter or less intense conflicts, its potential was limited, creating tactical challenges for its users. Despite this limitation, the Khasaldi adapted, developing strategies to maximize the Zekaril’s impact during critical moments of battle.

The Khasaldi revered the Zekaril as a sacred weapon, and only the most accomplished warriors were permitted to wield it. Attaining the rank of "Elite" within the tribe was a prestigious achievement, requiring a warrior to protect the Khasaldi people from certain death. Those who achieved this status were honored in a grand ceremony that involved both the tribe’s spiritual leaders and the artisans who crafted the Zekaril. The ritual emphasized the sacred bond between the warrior, the weapon, and the ravathil spirits believed to empower it.

The Zekaril’s introduction into Igirian warfare had a profound impact on the continent’s military landscape. News of its existence spread rapidly, sparking a wave of curiosity, fear, and ambition among neighboring tribes and kingdoms. The initial exclusivity of the Zekaril to the Khasaldi led other factions to develop theories ranging from divine intervention to secret attunement rituals. This confusion, coupled with the Khasaldi's intentional secrecy regarding its construction, fueled an era of innovation as rival factions sought to develop their own equivalents.

The most notable attempt at replicating the Zekaril’s effects came in the form of fire-based weaponry, where rival factions crafted similar attachments that stored oil and ignited upon impact. While these fire weapons offered an extended burn effect, they lacked the surprise and raw power of the Zekaril’s electric discharge. Nevertheless, they represented the first step toward a broader arms race centered around vibrational technology.

The Khasaldi Zekaril stood as both a testament to the tribe's ingenuity and a catalyst for the evolving methods of combat in Igir. It symbolized the relentless pursuit of power and survival that defined the continent’s inhabitants, as well as the dynamic interplay between technology, strategy, and spirituality. Though the Zekaril remained a rare and highly sought-after asset, its mere existence marked a turning point in Igir’s history, paving the way for future conflicts that would be defined by technological dominance as much as by traditional warfare.

By the end of the 19th Generation, the Zekaril had secured its place in the annals of Igirian history, with whispers of its potential spreading across the land. The Dyishram of Khomakl̴u, intrigued by the Khasaldi’s success, sought to develop a similar weapon, but their efforts remained largely unsuccessful. The Khasaldi’s mastery of vibrational technology and spiritual resonance kept the Zekaril as a defining symbol of their culture—a symbol that promised both power and peril in the generations to come.


The Rise and Fall of Dhari
Year 101 RA

Kenko Allias hadn’t planned on becoming a warrior. His calloused hands were meant for bartering goods, not wielding blades. He had learned to make a modest living, peddling small wares from the markets to the alleys of Khomakl̴u’s entertainment district. It was a life of hard work but enough to support Lili, his wife. Lili was a seamstress, stitching the lavish garments worn by performers in the district. They were simple folk, their dreams no grander than raising a family and finding solace in each other’s arms after long days.
But one night shattered that dream. Lili’s usual path home from work took her through a lawless part of the city, a neglected underbelly where the Dyishram’s presence was scarce. It was there, amidst the shadows, that she was attacked. She came home bruised and broken, her clothes torn, her face streaked with silent tears. Kenko’s world darkened that night as he sat beside her, his hands shaking as he cleaned her wounds. His sorrow soon turned to a quiet rage—a fire that burned hotter with each passing day.
Kenko’s anger wasn’t reckless. It was methodical, simmering like a pot on the verge of boiling over. He despised how the Dyishram allowed such lawlessness to fester, indifferent to the harm it caused to the most vulnerable. But he had to hide his rage; outward defiance would only invite further suffering. So, he channeled his anger into training. He stole a pair of swords from a Khasaldi mercenary, practicing in secret. In the dead of night, Kenko would strike the air with deliberate, precise movements—each swing a silent promise of vengeance.
When Lili realized she was pregnant, Kenko felt a mix of dread and hope. The child, whom they named Dhari, was both a reminder of the violence they endured and a symbol of their will to survive. Kenko swore to Lili that he would protect Dhari, not just from the streets that had taken their innocence, but from the very system that allowed such cruelty.
As Dhari grew, Kenko's lessons took a different form. He told Dhari stories of Igir—tales of kingdoms, warriors, and rebels who rose against corruption. Dhari’s eyes would widen with each tale, his young mind absorbing the ideas of justice and rebellion. Kenko’s training also intensified; he taught Dhari Idish’ko, a combat style focused on disabling rather than killing. Kenko insisted on this method because it mirrored his own philosophy—justice through restraint, retribution without needless bloodshed.
Dhari, now a young man, bore a striking resemblance to his mother. He had her sharp eyes, her dark hair, and her stubborn determination. Kenko often caught himself staring at Dhari’s face, a mixture of pride and guilt washing over him. He knew Dhari was aware of his origins. Lili, on her part, remained a quiet but resolute presence. She refused to let her trauma define her, pouring her strength into raising Dhari with the same resilience that had kept her alive.
By the time Dhari turned 21, whispers of rebellion began to stir among the lower districts. People were tired of the Dyishram’s deceit and growing authoritarianism. Dhari, charismatic and driven, became a natural leader among the discontented. His followers were a mix of the disillusioned—laborers, street performers, and even some defected Kenshi. Dhari’s speeches were impassioned, his words a blend of the teachings of Niroklo and the raw anger that pulsed through Khomakl̴u’s veins.
One evening, as Dhari prepared to address a growing crowd, Kenko stood beside him. “This isn’t just about vengeance, Dhari,” Kenko said, his voice rough with age and emotion. “It’s about giving people a reason to believe again.”
Dhari nodded, his jaw set. “I know, Father. But they must also see that there’s a price for betraying the people.”
The rebellion escalated rapidly. Dhari’s forces grew to nearly 4,000, a mix of rebels who had lost everything and those who believed they had everything to gain. They moved with precision, targeting the Dyishram’s barracks and strategic points. Among Dhari’s closest allies was Inaija, a fierce warrior and mother to a newborn. Her dedication was unyielding; she trusted Dhari to bring about the change they all sought, even as she sent her husband Duael and son into hiding for safety.
But tragedy struck swiftly. The Dyishram’s elite Kenshi tracked down Kenko and Lili, slaughtering them in cold blood. Dhari discovered their bodies in their small home, his father’s sword still clutched in his hand, his mother’s lifeless form cradled beside him. The scene broke something inside Dhari—he fell to his knees, silent tears streaming down his face.
The rebellion’s moral compass had been Kenko’s restraint. With his death, Dhari lost that anchor. Desperation drove him to consider a forbidden attunement—Cataclysmic Sunder, a technique shrouded in legend and feared for its catastrophic consequences. He believed it was the only way to end the Dyishram’s tyranny decisively. Dhari gathered his followers, leading them to the city’s center under the pretense of a grand ceremony.
The air was thick with anticipation as Dhari’s voice rose above the crowd. “Di anak khalo tesh vi den tiei. Akkha vi'sen ti lan tesh vi den tiei. Oy'iyus i khata anak vi den tiei. Chio onu tola lei an dalo kashti kei.”
His followers repeated the chant, their voices merging into a haunting chorus. As the ground began to tremble, some looked around nervously, but Dhari pressed on. In a final, devastating act, he slammed his hand to the ground, shouting:
"Isha kai da tio khalo tak ak Shi KAI'IDAI!"
The earth responded with a violent roar. The ground split open, swallowing Dhari’s rebels in a massive chasm. Khomakl̴u crumbled as shockwaves rippled outward. Dhari stood alone amidst the ruins, his eyes vacant, the cries of his fallen followers echoing in his ears. He had sought justice but found only destruction.
For the next 20 years, Dhari remained atop his self-made tower in the ruined city, numbing himself with vibrations that slowed his aging. He waited for someone worthy to challenge him—an adversary who could resist the temptations that had led him astray.
Dhari’s legacy was one of shattered ideals, a testament to the danger of unrestrained ambition and the cost of vengeance that lost its moral compass. His story left a scar on Igir, a warning to those who would seek power without the guidance of virtue.
State of Igir 
Year 121 RA

Igir remains in the aftermath of cataclysm, fragmented and reeling from the generational events that have shaped its current state. The continent's kingdoms, factions, and newly formed tribes now struggle to navigate an uncertain and scarred landscape. While some remnants cling to old beliefs, others seek new beginnings amidst the ruins of shattered lands.

Khomakl̴u
Once the center of Igirian civilization, Khomakl̴u is now a desolate wasteland. Dhari’s Cataclysmic Sunder has left little standing, the once-prosperous city now resembling a skeletal ruin. Its streets, once bustling with life, are filled with rubble and overgrowth, as nature reclaims what was lost to ambition. The Dyishram’s presence is almost entirely erased, their authority obliterated, leaving behind only fragmented survivors scattered in makeshift shelters.

The Bastion of Omu
The Khasaldi Bastion to the north, now known as the Bastion of Omu stands one of the few strongholds of stability on the continent apart from Ryamur, despite the devastation of Dhari’s rebellion. Under Omu’s guidance, this fortress has become a sanctuary for those who revere Dhari as the “New Messiah.” The Bastion’s inhabitants are a mix of Khasaldi warriors, Ineillis defectors, and former Dhari loyalists, all united by a shared belief that Dhari’s vision was an attempt to purge the world of its corrupt systems.
The Bastion thrives as a center for martial training and vibrational innovation, with warriors focusing on mastering the Zekaril and other vibrational technologies. Omu himself speaks of redemption, arguing that Dhari’s message was not one of destruction but of rebirth, misunderstood by those who feared his ambition. The Bastion’s influence grows as it attracts those disillusioned by the other factions' failures, offering hope for a new beginning amidst the ruins of Igir.

Tribes of Igir
Ao'li: Known for their reverence of vibrational mastery, they are determined to adapt Igir’s technologies for both warfare and agriculture, seeing it as a means of reclaiming stability.
Taili: A spiritualist tribe, they emphasize resilience and communal living, focused on preserving ancestral wisdom while avoiding the trappings of past conflicts.
Taryth: A warlike tribe born out of necessity, their members are primarily former mercenaries and refugees who banded together after the fall of Khomakl̴u. They are driven by survival, often resorting to raids and quick skirmishes to secure resources.
Raoch: This tribe has embraced the remnants of Khasaldi vibrational technology, attempting to forge alliances with the Bastion of Omu in hopes of reclaiming lost power.
Fien: A group composed mostly of former Attal seafarers, they cling to coastal regions, focusing on trade and defense in a bid to rebuild a semblance of their maritime traditions.
These tribes reflect the evolving landscape of Igir, with each vying for territory, influence, and survival in a world that no longer resembles its past.




The continent stands divided, yet not entirely devoid of hope. Amidst ruins and scattered peoples, a new dawn could still be possible—one forged by the determination of those who remain. Igir's lands may be marred, its dreams shattered, but the promise of renewal lingers in the hearts of its survivors.
With the fall of old powers and the emergence of new factions, Igir’s story is far from over. As the people grapple with the consequences of Dhari’s legacy and the ambitions that have shaped their past, they stand at a crossroads. Will unity be reclaimed, or will the continent continue its descent into discord? The fate of Igir now rests with those willing to rise from the ashes and build anew, driven by ambition, wisdom, or desperation.
The true journey of Igir begins now, as the Disciples of Igir step forward to shape its destiny, navigating the remnants of the past and the possibilities of the future.
